 “We currently have four-month-old mice that used to be diabetic and are no longer diabetic,” he added.
 Research is still in its early stages, according to Dr. Ehud Ur, a professor in the Faculty of Medicine at Dalhousie University in Halifax, Nova Scotia, and director of the clinical and scientific department of the Canadian Diabetes Association.
 Like other experts, he is sceptical about whether diabetes can be cured and points out that these findings are not relevant to those who already have type 1 diabetes.
 On Monday, Sara Danius, permanent secretary of the Swedish Academy's Nobel Prize in Literature Committee, publicly stated on a radio program in Sweden that, because the committee was unable to contact Bob Dylan directly to inform him of the 2016 Nobel Prize in Literature, it had abandoned its efforts to contact him.
 Danius said: “We are not doing anything at the moment. I called and emailed his closest assistant and received very cordial responses. For the time being, that is enough.”
 Earlier, Ring's chief executive, Jamie Siminoff, said the company had been prompted by the fact that the doorbell on his shop could not be heard from his garage.
 He said he built a wifi bell.
 Siminoff said sales spiked after her appearance on Shark Tank in 2013, when the show’s panel of investors declined to fund the company.
 By the end of 2017, Siminoff made an appearance on the television shopping channel QVC.
 Ring also reached a settlement in the litigation with the competing security company, ADT Corporation.
 To date, no drug has been proven to be effective in treating the existing infection caused by Ebola, although there is an experimental vaccine that appears to be able to reduce the mortality caused by the disease.
 Zmapp, a combination of antibodies, had promising early field results, but formal studies showed it was less beneficial than expected at preventing death.
 In the PALM trial, the function of Zmapp was a control, meaning that scientists used it as a baseline and compared it to the other three treatments.
 USA Gymnastics supports the United States Olympic Committee’s statement and recognizes the need for the Olympic community to foster a safe environment for all of our athletes.
 We agree with the USOC statement that the interests of athletes, clubs and their sports can be better served by moving forward with meaningful changes within our organization, rather than the withdrawal of certifications.
 USA Gymnastics supports an independent investigation that can shed light on how the abuse that Larry Nassar’s survivors so bravely described could have gone on for so long without being seen, and accepts any and all appropriate changes.
 The goal of USA Gymnastics and USOC is the same: to make gymnastics and other sports as safe as possible so that athletes can pursue their dreams in a protected, positive and empowering environment.
 During the 1960s, Brzezinski worked for John F. Kennedy as an adviser and later for the Lyndon B. Johnson administration.
 He advised Carter on foreign policy in the 1976 election, and later served as National Security Advisor (NSA) from 1977 to 1981, succeeding Henry Kissinger.
 As National Security Advisor, he assisted Carter in the diplomatic handling of international affairs, such as the 1978 Camp David Accords, the normalization of relations between the United States and China in the late 1970s, the Iranian Revolution of 1979, which led to a hostage crisis in Iran, and the Soviet invasion of Afghanistan in 1979.
 The film, starring Ryan Gosling and Emma Stone, was nominated in all the most important categories.
 Gosling and Stone were nominated for Best Actor and Best Actress, respectively.
 Other nominations include Best Picture, Best Director, Best Cinematography, Best Costume Design, Best Film Editing, Best Original Score, Best Production Design, Best Sound Editing, Best Sound Mixing and Best Original Screenplay.
 There were two nominations for best original song: Audition (The Fools Who Dream) and City of Stars. Lionsgate was nominated 26 times, more than any other studio.
 On Sunday night, in a statement made through the press secretary, the President of the United States of America, Donald Trump, announced that US troops would withdraw from Syria.
 The announcement came after Trump spoke with Turkish President Recep Tayyip Erdogan.
 Turkey would also assume the surveillance of ISIS militants who were captured, whom European nations, according to the statement, denied their repatriation.
 In addition to confirming that at least some dinosaurs were feathered, a theory that has been generally accepted, it also provides specific data that fossils generally do not, such as their color and their three-dimensional structure.
 According to experts, this animal has a brown plumage in the upper part and a pale or carotenoid tone in the lower part.
 The discovery also helps to better understand the evolution of bird feathers.
 Since the plumage of dinosaurs does not have a well-developed shaft, called rachis, but does have other features of feathers (barbs and barbules), the researchers concluded that the rachis is likely the result of an evolutionary development of these other features.
 The structure of the feathers suggests that their function was not related to flight, but rather to regulate or indicate body temperature. The researchers believe that, although it is the tail of a young dinosaur, the sample analyzed presents features of the plumage of an adult and not of a chick.
 The experts' assessment was that, even though it is the tail of a young dinosaur, the sample illustrates more the plumage of an adult than that of a chick.
 Yesterday morning in Gaziantep, Turkey, a car bomb killed two police officers and injured more than 20 others.
 The government said 19 of the injured were police officers.
 Police said the suspect in the attack is a suspected Daesh militant.
 It was discovered that the sun was governed by the same basic principles as other stars: the only factors driving its activity within the system were its luminosity and its rotation.
 The intensity of the light and the rotation are combined to calculate the Rossby number of a star, which is linked to the plasma flow.
 The lower the Rossby number, the less active the star is in relation to its magnetic reversals.
 Iwasaki faced many problems during his voyage.
 He was attacked by pirates, bitten by a rabid dog in Tibet, escaped from a marriage in Nepal and was stopped by the police in India.
 The 802.11n standard operates in both 2.4Ghz and 5.0Ghz frequencies.
 This will allow compatibility with earlier versions of 802.11a, 802.11b and 802.11g, provided that the base station has dual radios.
 The speeds of the 802.11n standard are much higher than those achieved by its predecessors, with a maximum theoretical throughput of 600 Mbps.
 Duvall, who is married and has two grown children, did not make a good impression on Miller, who was the one he told the story to.
 Asked for comment, Miller said: "Mike talks a lot during the hearing... I was preparing, so I really couldn't hear what he was saying."
 "We will work hard to reduce the carbon dioxide emissions per unit of GDP by 2020, so that the difference is significant compared with 2005," Hu said.
 He did not mention a figure for the cuts and said they would be based on China's economic output.
 Hu encouraged developing countries to “not return to the traditional path of polluting first and cleaning up later.”
 He added: “However, it is not right to demand that they assume obligations that exceed their stage of development, their level of responsibility and their capabilities.”
 The Iraq Study Group released its report at 12:00 GMT.
 He warns that no one can guarantee that any Iraqi action at this point will stop sectarian fighting, growing violence or a slide toward chaos.
 The report begins with a call for open debate and consensus in the United States about Middle East policies.
 The report is highly critical of virtually every aspect of the current executive branch policy in Iraq, and calls for an immediate change in direction.
 It contains 78 recommendations, the first of which is the adoption of a new initiative before the end of the year with the purpose of protecting Iraq's borders from hostile operations and to restore diplomatic ties with its neighbors.
 Cristina Fernández de Kirchner, who is currently a senator and is the first lady of the Argentine Republic, announced last night in La Plata, a city located 50 kilometers (31 miles) from Buenos Aires, that she will be running for president.
 The Argentine Theater was the place where Mrs. Kirchner announced her intention to run for president; this is the same place where she began her campaign for the Senate in 2005, representing the province of Buenos Aires.
 The issue that sparked the debate was the controversy over the budget for the relief and reconstruction following Hurricane Katrina, a measure that some fiscal conservatives jokingly dubbed the "Bush New Orleans Agreement."
 Criticism of the liberals in relation to the restoration works focuses on the fact that contracts for reconstruction have been awarded to people who, apparently, are Washington officials.
 More than four million people gathered in Rome to witness the funeral.
 So many people gathered that not everyone could get into the funeral in St. Peter's Square.
 Large television screens were set up in different parts of Rome so that everyone could watch the ceremony.
 In many other Italian cities, as well as all over the world, in particular in Poland, similar setups were carried out that saw many people.
 Historians criticize the FBI's past policies of concentrating its resources on easy-to-solve cases, especially car thefts, in order to improve its success rate.
 In fiscal year 2005, Congress began funding the campaign against obscenity and directed the FBI to assign 10 agents to deal with adult pornography.
 Robin Uthappa scored the highest in the innings: 70 runs with only 41 balls, hitting 11 fours and 2 sixes.
 The performance of both Sachin Tendulkar and Rahul Dravid, middle order batsmen, was good and they put on a century stand.
 But after losing the captain's wicket, India could only manage 36 runs and 7 of their wickets were bowled out to end the innings.
 U.S. President George W. Bush arrived in Singapore early on November 16, kicking off a seven-day tour of Asia.
 He was welcomed by Singapore's Deputy Prime Minister Wong Kan Seng and discussed trade and terrorism issues with the head of state, Lee Hsien Loong.
 After a week of midterm election defeats, Bush gave a speech to the audience about the commercial expansion in the Asian continent.
 Stephen Harper, the prime minister, agreed to send the government's Clean Air Act to a committee for review that includes all parties before second reading, and after a 25-minute meeting at the PMO on Tuesday with NDP leader Jack Layton.
 During the meeting with the Prime Minister, Layton had requested that changes be made to the Conservative environmental law, appealing to a "thorough and complete revision of its wording."
 Since the federal government intervened and assumed the financing of the Mersey hospital in Davenport, Tasmania, state authorities and some members of the federal parliament have denounced this measure as a deception, with an eye to the federal elections to be held in November.
 However, Prime Minister John Howard said the only purpose of the law was to protect the hospital facilities from degradation by the Tasmanian government, by granting an additional 45 million Australian dollars.
 As the latest report shows, sea level readings indicate the formation of a tsunami and some activity of this phenomenon was detected near Pago Pago and Niue.
 No major damage or injuries have been reported in Tonga, but electricity service was temporarily disrupted, which is believed to have prevented the Tongan authorities from receiving the tsunami warning issued by the PTWC.
 Fourteen schools on the Big Island or in the area near it closed completely on Wednesday, despite the warnings.
 George W. Bush, the president of the United States, welcomed the announcement.
 Bush spokesman Gordon Johndroe called the North Korean commitment "an important step toward the goal of verifiable denuclearization of the Korean peninsula."
 Today, the tenth storm of its hurricane season was named, which was named Subtropical Storm Jerry.
 The National Hurricane Center (NHC) said that for now it is expected that Jerry will touch the ground.
 According to estimates by the U.S. Army Corps of Engineers, up to 6 inches of rain could seep through the previously damaged dams.
 Due to the overflow of the dam that is near the Ninth Ward, the water is currently up to the waist in that area, which had already suffered flooding of up to 20 feet due to Hurricane Katrina.
 The water flows over the dam in a stretch that is 100 feet wide.
 Adam Cuerden, Commons administrator, expressed his frustration with the deletions in a statement he made to Wikinews last month.
 “Essentially, he [Wales] lied to us from the beginning, on the one hand pretending that he was doing it for legal reasons, and on the other hand pretending to listen to us until the moment when he removed the artistic content.”
 The community’s outrage led to current efforts to draft a policy on the site’s sexual content, which hosts millions of open-license media.
 Although it was an eminently theoretical work, the program was drafted with the purpose of simulating the observations made to the Sagittarius galaxy.
 It would be the tidal forces between the dark matter in the galaxy and that of the Milky Way that would cause the expected effect by the group of scientists.
 The Milky Way influences the Sagittarius galaxy in the same way that the moon exerts a gravitational pull on our planet and causes the tides.
 The experts concluded that dark matter interacts with each other in the same way as regular matter does.
 This theory holds that most of the dark matter surrounding a galaxy is located around it in a kind of halo and consists of numerous small particles.
 On television coverage can be seen white smoke emanating from the plant.
 The local government warns residents living near the plant not to leave their homes, to keep air conditioners off and not to drink tap water.
 According to the Japanese nuclear agency, radioactive cesium and iodine have been found in the plant.
 According to speculations of the authorities, everything indicates that the containers of the place that have uranium fuel could have broken and have losses.
 Extremely drug-resistant tuberculosis (XDR-TB) was first detected by Dr. Tony Moll in the South African area of Zululandia.
 In an interview, he said the new variant was causing "a lot of concern and alarm, given its high mortality rate."
 Dr. Moll believes that some patients may have contracted the virus inside the hospital and that at least two of the infected were health workers at that hospital.
 In one year, an infected person can infect between 10 and 15 people with whom he or she has had close contact.
 Nevertheless, the percentage of XDR-TB in the total TB patient group still appears to be low: 6000 out of a total of 333 000 individuals infected at a particular time in South Africa.
 The satellites, which weighed more than 1,000 pounds and traveled at nearly 17,500 miles per hour, collided 491 miles above the Earth.
 According to experts, the explosion that generated the collision was massive.
 They are still trying to establish how important the impact was and how it will affect the planet.
 The U.S. Strategic Command, which is part of the Defense Department, is conducting a search for the remains.
 The results of the tracking analysis will be made available on a free-access website.
 Ohio authorities said a doctor who worked at a children's hospital in Pittsburgh, Pennsylvania, will be charged with aggravated murder after the body of his mother was found in the trunk of his car on Wednesday.
 Dr. Malar Balasubramanian, 29, was found in Blue Ash, Ohio, a suburb located about 15 miles north of Cincinnati, lying on the ground beside the road, wearing a T-shirt and underwear, and in apparent state of overdose.
 He guided the officers to his black Oldsmobile Intrigue, which was 500 feet away.
 There they found the body of Saroja Balasubramanian, 53, covered with blood-stained blankets.
 Police said the body appeared to have been there for about a day.
 The first cases of the disease during this season were recorded in late July.
 Pigs are the carriers of the disease, which then migrates to humans via mosquitoes.
 The outbreak has led India's authorities to take measures such as deploying pig hunters, distributing thousands of mosquito nets to the population and using pesticides in the worst-affected areas.
 The authorities have also secured several million doses of the vaccine to fight encephalitis, which will allow health companies to prepare for next year.
 This year, the shortage of monetary resources and the low priority, compared to other diseases, have caused delays in the execution of the vaccine delivery plans in the historically most vulnerable regions.
 In 1956, Słania moved to Sweden, where, after three years, he got a job at the Swedish Post Office and there became Chief engraver.
 The number of stamps he has made, both for Sweden and for 28 other nations, exceeds 1,000.
 The quality and level of detail of his work is so recognized that he has become one of the few "household names" among philatelists, with people specializing in collecting his work.
 Included in the Guinness Book of World Records, his thousandth stamp was the mighty «Memorable Achievements of the Swedish Kings» (David Klöcker Ehrenstrahl, 2000).
 In addition, he has had a hand in the engraving of banknotes for many states, the most recent examples of his work being the portraits of the Prime Minister visible on the obverse of the new $5 and $100 Canadian banknotes.
 After the accident, Gibson was taken to a hospital, but died shortly after.
 The 64-year-old truck driver was unhurt in the accident.
 The vehicle was removed from the scene of the crash around 12:00 GMT on the same day.
 An employee of a garage near the accident site said: "There were children waiting to cross the street, and they all screamed and cried."
 Everyone ran back from the accident site.
 Other topics on the agenda in Bali are saving the forests that remain on the planet and sharing technologies to help developing nations grow in a less polluting way.
 The UN intends to complete a fund to assist countries affected by the effects of global warming, in order to be able to face its impact.
 Funds could be used to relocate homes out of flood zones, better manage water and diversify crops.
 Fluke wrote that efforts by some to silence women who speak out about the health of these women did not succeed.
 She concluded this based on the large number of positive and encouraging comments from women and men urging that contraceptive medications be considered a health need.
 Once the fighting had ceased, after the wounded had been taken to the hospital, about 40 of the remaining prisoners remained in the yard, refusing to go to their cells.
 Although negotiators tried to resolve the situation, the demands of the prisoners are confusing.
 The inmates set fire to the prison yard between 10:00 p.m. and 11:00 p.m. MDT.
 Quickly, agents armed with riot gear entered the yard and shot the inmates with tear gas.
 Firefighters extinguished the fire at 11:35 p.m.
 With the construction of the dam in 1963, seasonal flooding that left sediments along the river was stopped.
 This sediment was necessary for the formation of sand banks and beaches, which in turn functioned as habitats for wildlife.
 As a result, two species of fish have been extinguished and two others are in danger of extinction, including the gila cypha.
 While the water level will only rise a few feet past the flood, officials expect it to reach to rebuild the eroded sandbanks downstream.
 No tsunami alert has been issued or will be issued as the earthquake did not reach the 6.5 magnitude required for such an alert.
 Even though there was no threat of a tsunami, residents began to panic and leave their businesses and homes.
 While Winfrey cried at her farewell, she assured her fans that she would be back.
 "This is not a farewell; it's just the end of one chapter and the beginning of a new one."
 The comfortable re-election of the incumbent President, Hifikepunye Pohamba, was confirmed by the final results of the Namibian parliamentary and presidential elections.
 The ruling party, the South West Africa People's Organisation (SWAPO), also won the majority of votes in the legislative elections.
 Coalition and Afghan forces moved into the region to secure the site and additional coalition aircraft have been sent to assist.
 The accident took place high up in mountainous terrain and is believed to have been caused by a hostile fire.
 Efforts to find the crash site must contend with bad weather and rugged terrain.
 The Mangola Medical Association, Doctors Without Borders and the World Health Organization have called it the worst outbreak in the country.
 MSF spokesman Richard Veerman said: "Angola is heading for the worst outbreak it has ever faced and the situation remains very serious."
 The games started at 10:00 a.m., accompanied by good weather, and, except for a light rain in the middle of the morning that soon dissipated, it was an ideal day for 7s rugby.
 South Africa, the top seed in the tournament, started well by winning 26-0 against Zambia, who are fifth in the standings.
 Although they were shown off against their southern sisters, South Africa improved as the tournament went on.
 Their disciplined defense, ball handling skills and excellent teamwork led them to stand out and it was clear that this was the team to beat.
 The authorities in Amsterdam and the Anne Frank Museum say that a fungus has infected the tree and that it is dangerous to public health because it is in imminent danger of falling.
 His felling was scheduled for Tuesday, but was saved after an emergency court order.
 The diameter of all the entrances to the cave, known as the "Seven Sisters", is at least 100 m to 250 m (328 to 820 ft).
 As the infrared images show, the temperature variations during the day and night indicate that they are probably caves.
 During the day, its temperature is lower than that of the surrounding surface and, at night, higher.
 “While its thermal behavior is not as regular as the large caves on our planet, which tend to maintain a fairly stable temperature, it is consistent with these deep subsurface cavities,” said Glen Cushing, an archaeologist with the U.S. Geological Survey and Northern Arizona University in Flagstaff, Arizona.
 In France, elections have traditionally been a low-tech experience: Voters seal themselves in a booth and drop a pre-printed ballot into a box indicating the candidate they have chosen.
 After the officials verify the identity of the voter, the voter deposits the ballot in the ballot box and signs the list of voters.
 French electoral law sets out the procedures quite strictly.
 Since 1988, the ballot boxes have to be transparent, allowing voters and observers to verify that no extra ballots are added at the beginning of the vote and that only those of those who vote are added, duly counted and authorized.
 The candidates have the right to send representatives to monitor each stage of the process and, during the night, volunteers count the votes under strict supervision and in accordance with specific procedures.
 ASUS Eee PC, which was previously launched globally for its cost-saving and functionality advantages, became the subject of heated discussions at the Taipei 2007 Information Technology Month.
 But the market for laptop consumers changed drastically and then after ASUS received from the Executive Yuan of the Republic of China the 2007 Taiwan Sustainable Development Award.
 The station's website describes the program as "an old-school radio drama with a smart, new and offensive twist!"
 In its early days, the program was only broadcast on the internet radio site, TogiNet Radio, a long-standing space focused on the spoken radio format.
 In late 2015, TogiNet installed the AstroNet Radio station as a subsidiary.
 Originally, the show featured amateur voice actors, local to the East Texas area.
 It was reported that the widespread looting continued throughout the night, as there was no police presence on the streets of Bishkek.
 One observer described Bishkek as sinking into a state of “anarchy” as groups of people roamed the streets and looted consumer goods stores.
 Several residents of Bishkek blamed the southern protesters for the unrest.
 South Africa defeated New Zealand's All Blacks in a rugby match of the Tri Nations, at the Royal Bafokeng Stadium in Rustenburg, South Africa.
 The final score was 21-20, ending the All Blacks' 15-match winning streak.
 For the Springboks, it meant overcoming a run of five consecutive defeats.
 It was the last match for the All Blacks, who had already won the trophy two weeks earlier.
 The final match of the series will be played at Ellis Park, Johannesburg, next week, in a clash between the Springboks and Australia.
 A moderate earthquake shook western Montana at 10:08 p.m. Monday.
 Neither the U.S. Geological Survey nor its National Earthquake Information Center has reported any direct damage.
 The earthquake's epicenter was located about 20 km (15 mi) northeast of Dillon and almost 65 km (40 mi) south of Butte.
 They confirmed that the deadly avian flu strain in humans, H5N1, attacked a wild duck that died, which was found Monday in a pond near Lyon, in eastern France.
 France is the seventh country in the European Union to be hit by the virus, after Austria, Germany, Slovenia, Bulgaria, Greece and Italy.
 Suspected cases of H5N5 in Croatia and Denmark have not yet been confirmed.
 Chambers's complaint against God was based on "death everywhere, destruction and terror of millions and millions of people on the planet."
 Chambers, an agnostic, claims that his claim "has no merit" and that "anyone can sue anyone".
 The story told by the French opera presented by Camille Saint-Saens is that of an artist "whose life is prescribed by love, drugs and Japan".
 As a result, the artists smoke marijuana cigarettes on stage and the show encourages the audience to do the same.
 Former House Speaker Newt Gingrich, Texas Gov. Rick Perry and Rep. Michele Bachmann were fourth, fifth and sixth, respectively.
 After the results came in, Gingrich praised Santorum, but launched a stinging attack on Romney, whose campaign had run negative ads against Gingrich in Iowa.
 Perry said, "I would go back to Texas to evaluate the results of today's election and determine whether there is a path forward for me to run." He then said he would remain in the race and compete in the January 21st South Carolina primary.
 Bachmann, who won the Ames Straw Poll in August, decided to end her campaign.
 The photographer was taken to the Ronald Reagan UCLA Medical Center, where he later died.
 According to reports, he was in his twenties. Bieber said in a statement, "While I was not present nor directly involved in this terrible accident, my thoughts and prayers are with the victim's family."
 According to entertainment news website TMZ, the photographer stopped the vehicle on the Sepulveda Boulevard on the wrong side of the road and attempted to take photographs of the police stop before crossing the street and continuing, which caused the California Highway Patrol officer conducting the vehicle stop to twice give the photographer the order to return to the other side of the road.
 According to police officials, it is unlikely that the driver of the vehicle that hit the photographer will be prosecuted.
 With only eighteen medals available per day, several countries have failed to reach the podium of medals.
 Included are the Netherlands, with Anna Jochemsen, who yesterday placed ninth in the women's Super-G, and Finland, with Katjia Saarinen in tenth in the same event.
 Mitchell Gourley of Australia placed 11th in the men's standing slalom super-G. Czech competitor Oldrich Jelinek finished 16th in the men's sitting group.
 Arly Velásquez of Mexico placed 15th in the men's Super-G. Adam Hall of New Zealand finished ninth in the men's Super-G.
 The male visually impaired skier, Maciej Krezel, and his guide, Anna Ogarzynska, from Poland, finished in thirteenth place in the Super-G. Jong Seork Park of South Korea finished twenty-fourth in the men's sitting group.
 After the earthquake in 2010, UN peacekeepers arrived in Haiti and are blamed for spreading the disease, as the first cases were recorded near their camps.
 According to the demand, the waste from the UN camp was not properly sanitized, which caused the bacteria to enter the Artibonite River, one of the most powerful rivers in Haiti.
 Prior to the arrival of the peacekeepers, Haiti had not faced cholera since the 19th century.
 The Institute for Justice and Democracy in Haiti has mentioned the existence of independent tests that point to the UN peacekeeping battalion from Nepal as the unintentional introducer of the disease to Haiti.
 According to Danielle Lantagne, a disease specialist working for the UN, it is likely that the outbreak was caused by the peacekeepers.
 Hamilton confirmed that Howard University Hospital admitted the patient and that his condition was stable.
 The patient had been in Nigeria, where there were some cases of Ebola.
 The hospital has followed infection control protocols, including keeping the patient away from others to prevent infections.
 Prior to The Simpsons, Simon had held several jobs in other television shows, in various positions.
 In the 80s, he lent his collaboration in several programs, for example, Taxi, Cheers and The Tracy Ullman Show.
 In 1989, he helped create The Simpsons with Brooks and Groening, and was responsible for hiring the show's first writing staff.
 Although he left the show in 1993, he retained the title of executive producer and continued to receive tens of millions of dollars in royalties season after season.
 Earlier, China's official news agency Xinhua reported the hijacking of an aircraft.
 According to subsequent reports, the aircraft received a bomb threat and was diverted back to Afghanistan, where it landed in Kandahar.
 Preliminary reports indicate that the aircraft was diverted back to Afghanistan after it was denied permission to make an emergency landing in Urumchi.
 Air crashes are common in Iran, which has an old fleet that is not well maintained, either for civilian or military operations.
 International sanctions have resulted in the inability to acquire new aircraft.
 Three people were killed and three others injured in a police helicopter crash earlier this week.
 Last month, Iran experienced one of its worst air disasters in years when a passenger plane bound for Armenia crashed, killing all 168 passengers on board.
 That same month, another passenger plane overshot a runway in Mashhad and crashed into a wall, killing 17 people.
 Aerosmith canceled the remaining concerts of their tour.
 The rock band was scheduled to tour the U.S. and Canada, which was to end on September 16.
 The reason for the cancellation of the tour was the injury that suffered the singer Steven Tyler when he fell from the stage during one of his presentations on August 5.
 After both players held all the services of the set, Murray lost the first by sudden death.
 Although Del Potro held an initial advantage in the second set, this too was subject to a tie-break after reaching 6-6.
 At that point in the match, Del Potro had to receive treatment on his shoulder, but he was able to return to the game.
 The program began at 8:30 p. m. local time (15:00 UTC).
 Renowned national singers performed bhajans, or devotional songs, at the feet of Shri Shyam.
 Singer Sanju Sharma inaugurated the event and was followed by Jai Shankar Choudhary. He also performed the chhappan bhog bhajan, along with singer Raju Khandelwal.
 After that, Lakkha Singh took over to sing the bhajans.
 Baba Shyam was honored with 108 plates of Chhappan Bhog which, in Hindu religion, consists of 56 different edible items, such as sweets, fruits, nuts, dishes, among others, that are served as an offering to the god.
 In addition, Lakkha Singh performed the chhappan bhog bhajan along with the singer Raju Khandekwak.
 On Thursday, at the opening presentation of the Tokyo Game Show, Satoru Iwata, president of Nintento, unveiled the design of the controller for the new Nintendo Revolution console launched by the company.
 In a similar way to a remote control for a television, this control is provided with two sensors located near the user's television, enabling the triangulation of its position in a three-dimensional space.
 This will allow players to control actions and movements in video games, through the movement of the device in the air.
 Giancarlo Fisichella was unable to keep control of the vehicle and dropped out of the race shortly after the start.
 Fernando Alonso, his teammate, led for most of the race, but had to put an end to it just after his pit stop, surely because his right wheel was badly bent.
 Michael Schumacher retired from the race shortly after Alonso, due to a suspension failure, the result of numerous battles during the race.
 According to a transcript of the press conference, he said "she was very beautiful and that, in addition, she sang quite well."
 Every time we did a rehearsal of this, it moved me to the very depths of my soul.
 After about 3 minutes after takeoff, a camera inside showed numerous pieces of insulating foam falling off the fuel tank.
 However, it is believed that they did not cause any damage to the shuttle.
 N. Wayne Hale Jr., who runs NASA's shuttle program, said the foam fell "after the time of concern."
 Five minutes after the show began, a wind began to blow, which, about a minute later, had reached 70 kilometers per hour (...) then the rain came, but so strong and so dense that it pierced your skin like a needle. Then hail fell from the sky; people, terrified, screamed and ran over others.
 “I lost my sister and her friend, and, on the way back, I saw two people in wheelchairs and the others were jumping on them and pushing them,” Armand Versace said.
 NHK also said that the Kashiwazaki-Kariwa nuclear power plant in Niigata Prefecture was operating normally.
 Hokuriku Electric Power Co said the quake did not cause any incidents and that it shut down reactors 1 and 2 at its Shika nuclear plant.
 About 9,400 homes in the region are without water and some 100 without electricity.
 Some routes were damaged, train service was disrupted in the affected areas, and Noto airport in Ishikawa prefecture remains closed.
 A bomb was detonated at the door of the governor's office.
 Three other bombs were detonated near government buildings in a two-hour span.
 While there are reports that the official death toll is eight and the authorities have confirmed that nearly 30 people were injured, the official figures are still unknown.
 Concentrations of cyanuric acid and melamine were found in urine samples from animals that died after eating contaminated pet food.
 The researchers said the two compounds react with each other to form crystals that can obstruct kidney function.
 Experts detected the formation of crystals in the urine of cats, due to the incorporation of melamine and cyanuric acid.
 By comparing the use of infrared spectroscopy (FTIR), it was possible to determine that the composition of the crystals coincides with that found in the urine of affected pets.
 I don't know if you've noticed or not, but most of the products coming from Central America used to arrive in this country free of taxes.
 Even so, the Central American countries taxed eighty percent of the products we make. We treat them.
 It just didn't make sense to me; it was definitely not fair.
 All I say to people is that you treat us the way we treat you.
 A bill was proposed by the governor of California, Arnold Schwarzenegger, that would not allow the sale or rental of violent video games to minors.
 The bill requires violent video games sold in California to be labeled with a sticker that reads “18” and penalizes their sale to minors with a $1,000 fine for violation.
 The Director of the Crown Prosecution Service, Kier Starmer QC, made a statement this morning informing that Huhne and Pryce would be taken to trial.
 Huhne has resigned, and Ed Davey MP will replace him in the cabinet. Norman Lamb MP is expected to take over the business minister role Davey leaves vacant.
 February 16 is the date Huhne and Pryce are scheduled to appear before Westminster Magistrates' Court.
 Nicholas Alden and Zachary Cuddeback, 25 and 21 respectively, died. The latter was driving.
 Edgar Veguilla suffered injuries to his arm and jaw, while Kristoffer Schneider required facial reconstruction surgery.
 Uka's gun jammed as he aimed at the head of a fifth man. Schneider suffers permanent pain, cannot see out of one eye, has a missing piece of skull and his face had to be reconstructed with titanium.
 Schneider testified via a virtual link from a U.S. Air Force base in his home country.
 Carpanedo participated in two individual races of the championship apart from the competition of Wednesday.
 The first was the slalom, in which he failed to finish the first run, as did 36 of the 116 participants in that race.
 In her other race, the giant slalom, she finished tenth in the women's sitting group with a combined time of 4:41.30, 2:11.60 minutes behind the first-place Austrian, Claudia Loesch, and 1:09.02 minutes behind the ninth-place finisher, Gyöngyi Dani, of Hungary.
 Four category sitters failed to complete their runs and a total of 45 participants out of 117 in the Giant Slalom did not make the cut.
 The Madhya Pradesh police were able to recover the stolen laptop and cell phone.
 Deputy Inspector General D.K. Arya said: "We have arrested five individuals who abused the Swiss woman and recovered her mobile phone and laptop."
 Baba, Bhutha, Rampro, Gaza and Vishnu Kanjar are the accused.
 According to the superintendent of police, Chandra Shekhar Solanki, the accused appeared before the court with their faces covered.
 Although there were three people inside the house at the time of the car crash, none of them were injured.
 However, the driver suffered serious injuries to his head.
 The road where the accident occurred was temporarily closed while emergency services pulled the driver of the red Audi TT out of the car.
 At first, he was taken to the James Paget Hospital in Great Yarmouth.
 He was then transferred to Addenbrooke's Hospital in Cambridge.
 Since then, Adekoya has been in the Edinburgh County Court, charged with the murder of her son.
 While she is in custody awaiting charges and trial, any statement from an eyewitness may be questionable, as her image has been widely circulated.
 It is common practice in other parts of the UK, but as the Scottish legal system works differently, the courts considered the publication of the photographs to be potentially damaging.
 Pamela Ferguson, a professor at the University of Dundee, said: "It seems journalists are treading on dangerous ground when they publish pictures or other information about suspects.
 The Crown Office, which handles prosecutions, told reporters it would not be making any further comment at least until the indictment is issued.
 According to the information that leaked, the document will deal with the border conflict, which Palestine intends to resolve based on the boundaries in force prior to the 1967 Middle East War.
 Other topics that were also addressed, according to reports, included the future status of Jerusalem, which both nations consider holy, and the issue of the Jordan Valley.
 Israel demands a constant military presence in the valley for ten years once the agreement is signed, while the PA only accepts five.
 During the supplementary pest control trial, rangers were required to closely supervise the shooters, as the shooter was monitored and their effectiveness assessed.
 In a partnership between NPWS and the New South Wales Association of Sporting Shooters Inc., suitable volunteers were recruited from the Association's hunting program.
 Mick O'Flynn, who is in charge, provisionally, of the Conservation and Heritage office of the NPWS, said that an integral training in safety and training was given to the four shooters chosen for the shooting operation.
 Yesterday, Martelly swore in a new nine-member Provisional Electoral Council (CEP).
 In four years, it is the fifth PEC of Martelly.
 Last month, a presidential commission advised the previous CEP to resign, as part of a series of measures aimed at leading the country to new elections.
 The commission was the way in which Martelly responded to the widespread demonstrations that began in October against the regime.
 The demonstrations, sometimes violent, were provoked by the fact that elections have not been held, in some cases since 2011.
 Nearly 60 cases of iPods with problems of operation and excessive heating have been reported, which caused six fires and minor burns to four people.
 The Japanese Ministry of Economy, Trade and Industry (METI) reported 27 accidents involving these devices.
 Last week, METI announced that Apple had reported 34 additional overheating incidents, which the company categorized as “non-serious.”
 The ministry commented on the delay in the Apple report, saying it was something "truly regrettable."
 Mariana was shaken by an earthquake at 7:19 a.m. local time (21:19 GMT) on Friday.
 The Northern Marianas Emergency Management Agency said there were no reports of damage in the territory.
 The Pacific Tsunami Warning Center also reported no tsunami indicators.
 In Manila, the capital of the Philippines, a former police officer seized a bus and held hostage tourists from Hong Kong.
 Rolando Mendoza opened fire with his M16 rifle on the foreign visitors.
 Several hostages have been rescued and at least six have been confirmed dead so far.
 Both the six hostages, including children and elderly, and the Filipino photographers were freed early.
 Later, photographers took the place of an old woman because she needed to go to the bathroom. Mendoza was gunned down.
 Liggins followed in his father's footsteps and began studying medicine.
 She trained as an obstetrician and began working at Auckland's National Women's Hospital around 1959.
 Liggins began her research on premature birth in her spare time while working at the hospital.
 His study showed that the baby's fetal lung maturation could be accelerated through the administration of a hormone.
 Xinhua reported that on Wednesday government investigators were able to retrieve the flight recorders from the black box.
 Luna's fellow wrestlers also paid tribute to him.
 Tommy Dreamer said: "Luna was the first Queen of the Extreme. She died on the night of the two moons, something unique, like her. A strong woman."
 Dustin Oro en Polvo Runnels stated: "Luna was as rare as I was; even more so. I love her and I will miss her. I hope she is in a better place."
 Since 2008, among the 1,400 polled prior to the 2010 federal election, there was an 8% increase in those opposed to Australia becoming a republic.
 Julia Gillard, the acting prime minister, said during the 2010 federal election campaign that she believed Australia should become a republic once Queen Elizabeth II’s reign ended.
 34% of respondents share this view and want Queen Elizabeth II to be the last monarch to have Australia.
 At one end of the scale, 29% of people think Australia should become a republic as soon as possible, while at the other end, 31% think it should never become one.
 The Olympic gold medallist was due to swim the 100m and 200m freestyle and three relays at the Commonwealth Games, but his fitness has been called into question following his complaints.
 She has not been able to take painkillers because they are banned from the Games.
 On January 25, Curtis Cooper, a mathematician and computer science professor at the University of Central Missouri, discovered the largest prime number known.
 Many people verified the find using various types of hardware and software and in early February and it was made public on Tuesday.
 Comets may have served as a source of water and organic matter for our planet, which has the ability to form proteins and sustain life.
 The expectation of scientists is to understand how planets originate, in particular ours, since comets crashed into the Earth a long time ago.
 Cuomo, 53, took office at the start of the year and last month signed a bill allowing same-sex couples to marry.
 He called the rumors "political chatter and nonsense."
 He is speculated to run for the presidential election in 2016.
 NextGen is a system that, according to the Federal Aviation Administration, would reduce the distances of air routes, which would save millions of gallons of fuel per year, as well as carbon emissions.
 It employs satellite technology, in contrast to the old ground-based radar technology, to enable air traffic controllers to detect aircraft more accurately and provide more accurate data to pilots.
 No additional transportation will be implemented and trains will not stop at Wembley. Car parking and deterrent will not be available.
 Due to the concern over the possible lack of transportation, the possibility of the game being played behind closed doors, without the team's fans, was considered.
 On Thursday, the journal Science reported on the discovery of a new species of bird on the Ecuadorian Galápagos Islands.
 Experts from Princeton University in the United States and Uppsala University in Sweden have revealed that the new species evolved in just two generations, despite it being thought to take much longer, due to the reproduction between an endemic Darwin finch, Geospiza fortes, and a migratory cactus finch, Geospiza conirostris.
 Gold can take on all kinds of shapes and curl into tiny figures.
 Not only can it be hammered and rolled into sheets, but it can also be stretched to a very thin wire that can be twisted and braided.
 It can be made very thin and adhered to another metal. It is so thin that it was used to decorate hand-made illustrations in books called "illuminated manuscripts".
 This is called the pH of a chemical. You can make a pH indicator using red cabbage juice.
 The color of the cabbage juice will be altered depending on how acidic or basic (alkaline) the chemical is.
 The number of hydrogen ions (the H in pH) present in the chemical being analyzed determines its pH level.
 Hydrogen atoms are made up of a proton and an electron, so a hydrogen ion is the result of stripping a proton of its electron.
 Shake both dry powders together and, after doing so, with clean and moist hands, squeeze them to form a ball.
 A reaction will occur between the moisture in your hands and your outer layers, which will feel strange to the touch and form a kind of shell.
 The cities of Harappa and Mohenjo-daro had flush toilets in almost every house, which were connected to a sophisticated drainage system.
 In some Minoan city homes in Crete and Santorini, Greece, there are remains of sewer systems.
 Toilets were also used in ancient Egypt, Persia and China. In the Roman civilization, public baths had toilets and some were shared by men and women.
 When one communicates with someone who is thousands of miles away, one is using a satellite.
 The satellite in space receives the call and then reflects it back almost instantly.
 The satellite was sent into space via a rocket. Scientists use telescopes in space, as the light from the Earth's atmosphere distorts some of the light and view we have.
 A giant rocket, more than 100 feet tall, is needed to get a satellite or telescope into outer space.
 The wheel has changed the world in surprising ways. The most relevant thing it has done for us is to provide us with a much simpler and faster form of transportation.
 Thanks to it we have many means of transportation, such as the railway or the automobile, among many others.
 Below, there are more moderate sized felines that feed on medium sized prey, from rabbits to antelopes and deer.
 Finally, there are many small felines (including independent domestic cats) that feed on species of small size that exist in much greater quantity, such as insects, rodents, lizards and birds.
 The secret of their success is the concept of niche: each feline has a particular function, which prevents it from competing with others.
 Lions are the most social of the felines and live in large groups called prides.
 The herds are formed by one to three adult males of the same family group, joined with up to thirty females and their offspring.
 Generally, the females are closely related to each other, making them a large family of sisters and daughters.
 Lion prides behave in much the same way as wolf or dog prides, with whom they share a surprising similarity (unlike other big cats) in both their behavior and in being highly lethal to their prey.
 An all-around athlete, the tiger has the ability to climb (but not very well), swim, jump long distances, and pull five times as hard as a strong person.
 The tiger is of the same genus (Panthera) as lions, leopards and jaguars, the only four felines capable of roaring.
 The tiger's roar is not a fully sonorous roar like the lion's, but rather a prayer of words spoken in growls and screams.
 Ocelots enjoy feeding on small creatures. If possible, they will hunt monkeys, snakes, rodents, and birds. Almost all of their prey will be much smaller than they are.
 Scientists believe that ocelots track and find animals to eat (prey) through smell, smelling the ground where they have passed.
 They have very good night vision and in dark places and, in addition, they move very silently. Ocelots hunt their prey by mimicking their surroundings and then rush at them.
 When a small group of living things (a small population) is separated from the main one from which it came (for example, if it moves to a mountain range or a river, or if it travels to a new island so that it cannot easily return) it will often find itself in an environment different from the one it was used to.
 The new environment has different resources and competitors, and so a new population will need different characteristics or adaptations from the old one to be a strong competitor.
 No changes have occurred in the original population, which still require the same adaptations as in the past.
 As time passes, as the incipient population adapts to the new environment, it begins to resemble the other population less and less.
 Eventually, after thousands or even millions of years, the two populations will look so different that they will not be classified as the same species.
 This process is called speciation, which simply means the development of new species, and is an inevitable consequence and a fundamental part of evolution.
 Plants generate the oxygen that people breathe and absorb the carbon dioxide that they exhale (that they give off).
 Plants generate food with the energy of the sun, thanks to photosynthesis, and they also provide shade.
 We build our houses from plants and we make clothes from them too. Most of the food we eat is plants. Without them, animals would not survive.
 The Mosasaurus was the alpha predator of its time, so it feared nothing, except other members of its own species.
 Its long jaws had more than 70 razor-sharp teeth, plus an additional set in the palate, which meant that anything that came in its way had no escape.
 We don’t know for sure, but it could have had viperine. Its diet included turtles, large fish, other mosasaurs, and it may even have been a cannibal.
 He also attacked any creature that entered the water: not even a dinosaur as huge as the T. Rex was a threat to him.
 While most of that food would be familiar to us, the Romans also ate some rather unconventional items at banquets, such as wild boar, peacocks, snails, and even a type of rodent, the porcupine.
 Another thing that distinguished the humble people and women from the wealthy was that the humble people and women ate sitting on a chair, while the wealthy enjoyed sharing banquets and lying down while eating.
 It is not possible that the recipes of ancient Rome included foods that arrived in Europe from America or Asia centuries later.
 For example, they had no corn, tomatoes, potatoes, or cacao, and no Roman of antiquity ever tasted a turkey.
 The Babylonians built for each of their gods a central temple considered their home.
 People made sacrifices to the gods and priests sought to meet the needs of those by celebrating ceremonies and festivals.
 The temples had an open courtyard and then an inner sanctuary that only priests could enter.
 Sometimes, special pyramid-shaped towers called ziggurats were built to be part of the temples.
 The top of the tower was a special sanctuary for their deity.
 In the warm climate of the Middle East, the house was not of major importance.
 Jewish families spent most of their time outdoors.
 Women cooked in the yard; the shops were just counters that gave to the street. The houses were built of stone.
 There were no large forests in the land of Canaan, so wood was extremely expensive.
 Very few inhabitants lived in Greenland. According to the Norse sagas, Erik the Red was exiled from Iceland for murder and, during a voyage he undertook further west, he discovered the island and gave it its name.
 Even so, notwithstanding their discovery, the Eskimo tribes already inhabited the place at that time.
 Although each country was "Scandinavian" in its own right, there were marked differences in the people, monarchs, customs, and history of Denmark, Sweden, Norway, and Iceland.
 If you saw the movie National Treasure, you might think that a treasure map was drawn on the back of the Declaration of Independence.
 However, that is not true. While the reverse of the document does contain some writing, it is not a map to a treasure.
 The Declaration of Independence is written on the back of the document, with the words "Original Declaration of Independence July 4, 1776" at the bottom of the document, upside down.
 Although it is not known for certain who drafted it, it is known that the enormous parchment document (measuring 29¾ inches by 24½ inches) was rolled up for safekeeping.
 Therefore, it is likely that the notation was added as a label only.
 While the landings on D-Day and the subsequent fighting had liberated northern France, the south remained to be dealt with.
 Its government was in the hands of the French of Vichy, who were a group that in 1940 had agreed to peace with the Germans and were working with the invaders rather than fighting them.
 On August 15, 1940, the so-called «Operation Dragon» was deployed, through which the Allies invaded southern France.
 In just two weeks, American and Free French forces had liberated southern France and were moving on to Germany.
 A civilization can be defined as a specific culture that is shared by a large group of people who live and work together; that is, a society.
 The term civilization derives from the Latin civilis, which means civil, and is related to the word civis, of the same language, which means citizen, as well as civitas, which means city or city state and which, in addition, determines the size of the society.
 The state cities are the precursors of the nations. A civilization culture involves a long generational transmission of knowledge, a lasting cultural legacy and a homogeneous spread.
 Minority cultures usually disappear without leaving any relevant historical traces, and fail to be recognized as civilizations in their own right.
 During the Revolutionary War, the thirteen states formed, at first, a weak central government under the Articles of Confederation, in which the Congress was its only component.
 Congress had no power to levy taxes, and since there was no national executive or judicial authority, the states often failed to cooperate in enforcing all of their laws.
 Nor was it empowered to annul tax laws or tariffs between states.
 The articles required the unanimous approval of all states to proceed to their amendment and the states gave so little importance to the central government that their representatives used to absent themselves.
 The Italian national football team, along with the German national team, is the second most successful team in the world and won the FIFA World Cup in 2006.
 Among the sports that are practiced the most are football, basketball, volleyball, water polo, fencing, rugby, cycling, ice hockey, roller hockey and Formula 1 racing.
 Winter sports are more popular in the northern regions, with athletes participating in international tournaments and Olympic events.
 Japan has nearly 7,000 islands (the largest is Honshu), making it the seventh largest archipelago in the world.
 Due to the conglomerate/group of islands it contains, Japan is often referred to as an "archipelago", from a geographical point of view.
 The history of Taiwan dates back to the 15th century, when European sailors who sailed the place recorded the name of the island as Ilha Formosa, that is, beautiful island.
 The establishment, in 1624, by the Dutch East India Company, of a base in southwestern Taiwan, initiated a transformation in the indigenous method of grain production, with the use of Chinese labour to work on its rice and sugar plantations.
 The Qing Dynasty (1644–1912) army took control of the northern and western coastal region of Taiwan in 1683 and declared Taiwan a province of the Qing Empire in 1885.
 In 1895, after being defeated in the First Sino-Japanese War (1894-1895), the Qing government signed the Treaty of Shimonoseki, which ceded sovereignty over Taiwan to Japan, which retained control of the island until 1945.
 Machu Picchu has three main constructions: Intihuatana, the Temple of the Sun and the Three Windows.
 Most of the buildings at the ends of the complex have been reconstructed so that tourists can see what they looked like originally.
 By 1976, thirty percent of Machu Picchu had already been restored and work continues today.
 To exemplify, the most common still image photography format globally is 35 mm, which was the most used film size towards the end of the analogue film era.
 Today it is still produced, but the most important thing is that its dimensional relationship was transferred to the image sensor formats of digital cameras.
 In fact, the 35 mm format is somewhat confusing, as its dimensions are 36 mm wide by 24 mm high.
 It is said that the dimensional relationship of this format (dividing by twelve in order to calculate the simplest ratio of whole numbers) is equivalent to 3:2.
 Many typical formats (e.g., the APS group of formats) are the same or very similar to this aspect ratio.
 The rule of thirds, which has been the subject of constant mockery and ridicule, is a simple guideline that generates dynamism while allowing some order to the images.
 It indicates that the most effective position to place the central object is the intersection that is formed between the horizontal and vertical lines that divide the image into thirds (see example).
 During this phase of European history, the Catholic Church, which had accumulated wealth and power, was questioned.
 For more than a millennium, Christianity had managed to unite the European states despite their different languages and customs.
 His power, present everywhere, affected everyone, from the monarch to the plebeian.
 One of the most important principles of Christianity is that wealth should be used to alleviate suffering and poverty, and that church funds are reserved for that specific function.
 The central dome of the church had stood in Rome for over a millennium and this concentration of power and money made many wonder if this principle was being respected.
 Shortly after the outbreak of hostilities, the British began a naval blockade of Germany.
 While the strategy, which involved the interruption of vital military and civilian supplies, was successful, it violated generally recognized international law and was contemplated in several international agreements of the last two centuries.
 Britain drew international waters in entire ocean sectors to block the entry of ships, even endangering neutral vessels.
 Having received a reduced response to this tactic, Germany thought it would meet a similar response to its unrestricted submarine warfare.
 Throughout the 1920s, the attitude of most citizens and nations was one of pacifism and isolation.
 After seeing the horrors and atrocities of the First World War, countries wanted to prevent such a situation from happening again in the future.
 In 1884, Tesla moved to the United States to take a job with the Edison Company in New York.
 He arrived in the US with 4 cents, a book of poems, and a letter of recommendation from Charles Batchelor (his manager at his last job) addressed to Thomas Edison.
 Ancient China had a unique way of delimiting the different periods of time. Each stage or each ruling family constituted a different dynasty.
 Between each dynasty, there was also a period of instability, with provinces divided. The most well-known was the Three Kingdoms period, which lasted for 60 years, between the Han and Jin dynasties.
 During these stages, a bloody war broke out between many nobles who disputed the throne.
 One of the bloodiest periods in the history of Ancient China was the Three Kingdoms period, where thousands of people died in a struggle to occupy the throne of the great palace in Xi'an.
 There are many political and social consequences, such as the use of the metric system, the shift from absolutism to republicanism, nationalism, and the belief that the country belongs to the people, not to a single sovereign.
 Also, after the Revolution, the posts were open to all male candidates, which allowed the success of the most ambitious and prestigious.
 The same is true of the military, as instead of basing the army's ranks on classes, they are now based on caliber.
 The French Revolution was also a source of inspiration for many other oppressed working class people in other countries to face their own revolutions.
 Muhammad was deeply interested in matters beyond this worldly life. He used to visit a cave which became known as "Hira" on the mountain of "Noor" (light) to reflect.
 The cave itself, which has endured through time, illustrates in a very realistic way the spiritual inclinations of Muhammad.
 At the top of one of the mountains north of Mecca, lies a cave completely cut off from the rest of the planet.
 Indeed, it is very difficult to find, even if one is sure of its existence. Inside the cave, the isolation is total.
 Nothing can be seen but the wonderful clear sky and the numerous mountains in the surrounding area. From the inside of this cave, one can see or hear very little of this world.
 Of the seven wonders, the only one that still stands is the Great Pyramid of Giza.
 The Great Pyramid, built by the Egyptian people in the 3rd century BC, is one of many large pyramid-shaped structures built to honor the deceased pharaoh.
 The Giza Plateau, or Giza Necropolis, in the Valley of the Kings, Egypt, contains numerous pyramids (of which the Great Pyramid is the largest), several smaller pyramids, temples, and the Great Sphinx.
 The Great Pyramid was built in honor of Pharaoh Khufu, and many other pyramids, tombs and smaller temples were erected in honor of his wives and family.
 The "upward bow" mark resembles a V and the "downward bow" mark is similar to a staple or a square without its bottom edge.
 Up means that you should start at the tip and push the bow, and down means that you should start at the heel, where the hand holds the bow, and pull it.
 The upward movement of the bow generates a softer sound, while a downward movement is louder and more abrupt.
 Feel free to make your own marks with pencil, but please remember that the marks on the bowed instruments have been printed in that place for a musical purpose and should therefore be respected.
 On October 6, 1789, a mob of women from the market forced the terrified monarch Louis XVI, Marie Antoinette, their two young children (Marie Therese, 11, and Louis Charles, 4), and the king's sister, Madam Elizabeth, to return to Paris from Versailles.
 They traveled back to Paris in a carriage surrounded by a mob that shouted and threatened the king and queen.
 The crowd forced the king and queen to open the windows of their carriage completely.
 At one point, a participant in the uprising shook the head of a royal guard executed in Versailles in front of the queen, who was in a panic.
 The Filipino people themselves paid the costs of the U.S. imperialism's war of conquest in the Philippines.
 They were forced to pay taxes to the US colonial regime to cover most of the interest and principal on bonds floated in the name of the Filipino government in Wall Street banks.
 Already, the super profits derived from the prolonged exploitation of the Filipino people would constitute the main gains of US imperialism.
 To understand the Templars, it is necessary to understand the context that gave rise to the establishment of the order.
 The European historical period in which these events took place is commonly known as the High Middle Ages, between the 11th, 12th and 13th centuries (i.e., between the years 1000 and 1300 A.D.).
 The High Middle Ages was preceded by the Early Middle Ages and followed by the Late Middle Ages which, by convention, ended around 1500.
 Technological determinism is a concept that encompasses, pragmatically, a wide range of ideas, from the technological imperative to a strict sense that there is an underlying logic that drives the destiny of humanity and that relates to the laws of science and how they are embodied in technology.
 Almost all interpretations of technological determinism have in common two general ideas: that technological development itself unfolds along a path independent of any cultural or political influence and that, at the same time, technology has “effects” on societies that are inherent and not socially conditioned.
 To take an example, one could argue that the existence of automobiles necessarily leads to the development of roads.
 However, a national road network is not economically viable for a small volume of cars, so new manufacturing techniques are being developed to reduce the costs of owning a vehicle.
 The mass use of automobiles also generates a higher incidence of traffic accidents, which leads to the development of new techniques in the field of health to repair damaged bodies.
 The element of cultural determinism was very present in romanticism, according to scholars like Goethe, Fichte and Schlegel.
 In the context of Romanticism, geography shaped people and, over time, customs and cultures developed that were related to that geography and, being in harmony with the location of that society, were preferable to laws that were imposed arbitrarily.
 Just as Paris is known as the fashion capital of the world today, Constantinople was considered as such in feudal Europe.
 Its fame as a center of luxury began around 400 BC and lasted until about 1100 AD.
 During the 12th century, their status declined, in part because the crusaders brought back gifts such as silks and spices, which were more valued than the goods offered in Byzantine markets.
 The title of "capital of fashion" was transferred from Constantinople to Paris.
 The peak of the Gothic style took place in the period between the 10th-11th and 14th centuries.
 At first, the way of dressing received great influence from the Byzantine culture in the east.
 However, due to the slowness of the communication channels, Western styles could take a delay of 25 to 30 years.
 By the late Middle Ages, Western Europe began to develop its own style. One of the most significant advances of that time was that, as a result of the Crusades, people began to use buttons to fasten their garments.
 Subsistence agriculture is understood as that whose objective is to produce enough food to meet the needs of the farmer and his family group exclusively.
 Subsistence agriculture is a simple, generally organic practice that combines the use of regionally native stored seeds with crop rotation or other comparatively simple methods to maximize production.
 Historically, much of the main activity of farmers was subsistence agriculture, which is still practiced in many developing countries.
 Subcultures congregate individuals with similar ideas and feelings of marginalization from social standards and provides them with the opportunity to generate a sense of identity.
 There are many factors that can distinguish subcultures: age, ethnicity, class, location, or gender of their members.
 The features that distinguish a subculture may be linguistic, aesthetic, sexual, geographic, or related to religion or politics, or a mixture of factors.
 It is common for members of a subculture to exhibit traits of their membership by using distinctive and symbolic style, such as fashions, gestures, and jargon.
 One of the most commonly used mechanisms to graph the importance of socialization is to analyze the few and unfortunate cases of children who, through negligence, misfortune or intentional abuse, were not socialized by adults during their growth.
 These children are called “feral children.” Some feral children are confined by people, usually their parents. In some cases, the abandonment of a child is due to the parents’ rejection of the child’s severe intellectual or physical disability.
 It is possible that the feral children suffered from traumatic situations or severe child abuse before they were abandoned or ran away.
 It is said that others were raised by animals and that some have lived on their own in the wild.
 When the wild child is raised exclusively by animals other than humans, it presents behaviors (within its physical possibilities) almost equal to those of the specific animal that took care of it, as well as its fear or indifference towards people.
 While project-based learning should facilitate that process and make it more interesting, scaffolding goes a bit further.
 Scaffolding is not a learning technique; it is, rather, an aid that provides support to those who are experiencing a new experience, such as using a new computer program or starting a new project.
 The scaffolding can be presented in both real and virtual formats; in other words, a teacher is a type of scaffolding, but so is the animated little sticky note in Microsoft Office.
 Virtual scaffolding is built into the software and its function is to question, stimulate or explain procedures that may have been complex for the student on his own.
 Children are placed in foster homes for a wide variety of reasons, from neglect to abuse and even extortion.
 No child should ever have to grow up in an environment where there is no love, care and education; but it happens.
 We can see that the foster care system provides a safe environment for these children.
 The goal of our foster care system is to provide safe homes, loving caregivers, sustained education, and reliable medical care.
 The purpose of foster care is to meet all the needs that were not met in the home from which they were removed.
 The Internet unites and mixes components of mass communication and between people.
 The different features of the Internet open up new dimensions from the perspective of the concept of uses and rewards.
 For example, "learning" and "socialization" are cited as significant incentives for Internet use (James et al., 1995).
 During a study of user reactions to websites conducted by Eighmey and McCord (1998), "personal involvement" and "enduring relationships" were also detected as new motivational factors.
 Through the recording of videos, important findings have been made in the interpretation of microexpressions, which are movements in the face of only a few milliseconds in duration.
 Specifically, it is argued that, through the proper reading of their micro-expressions, it is possible to detect whether a person is lying.
 Oliver Sacks, in his article The President's Speech, explained how those who cannot understand speech because of brain damage can nevertheless assess sincerity accurately.
 He even suggests that the skills for interpreting human behavior can be shared with animals, such as domestic dogs.
 Through the research work of the twentieth century it has been demonstrated that there are two groups of genetic variation: the hidden and the manifest.
 The process of mutation incorporates a new genetic variation; the process of selection removes it from that set of variations.
 Segregation and recombination shuffle the variation from one generation to the next.
 In the savannah, it is not easy for a primate, whose digestive system is the same as that of humans, to satisfy its amino acid needs with the vegetable resources available.
 Not doing so causes serious problems: stunted growth, malnutrition and, ultimately, death.
 The proteins present in leaves and legumes would have been the most easily accessible source of plant food, but they are not easily digestible for primates like us, except when cooked.
 In contrast, foods derived from animals (ants, termites, eggs) are easy to digest while providing a large number of proteins that contain all the essential amino acids.
 In short, it should not surprise us if our own ancestors solved their “protein problems” in the same way as savanna chimpanzees do today.
 Interrupted sleep consists of waking up intentionally during the normal sleep period and falling asleep again after a while (10 to 60 minutes).
 This can be easily achieved with a more or less gentle alarm clock that will bring him back to a conscious state, though without fully waking him up.
 Registration is an additional requirement for the visa process. In some countries, you will have to register your presence and the address of your accommodation with the local authorities.
 Other options that are based on the biological rhythm consist in drinking a lot of liquid (especially water or tea, known diuretic) before going to bed, which will force him to get up to urinate.
 The level of inner peace a person enjoys is inversely related to the amount of tension in his body and in his spirit.
 The lower the tension, the more positive the life force we have to count on. Each of us has the potential to find absolute peace and joy.
 We can all reach enlightenment. The only thing that blocks the way is our tension and negativity.
 While the foundations of Tibetan Buddhism are the teachings of the Buddha, they were extended on the path of Mahayana love and numerous yoga techniques from India.
 In general terms, laism is very simple. It is based on kundalini yoga, meditation and the path of love that encompasses everything.
 In Kundalini Yoga, the Kundalini energy (illumination) is activated with yoga postures, breathing practices, mantras or visualizations.
 Tibetan meditation focuses on Devata Yoga, through the visualization of various deities, can unblock the energy channels, activate the chakras and develop the awareness of enlightenment.
 Cooperation between the USSR and the USA was the result of facing a common enemy, Germany, during the Second World War. After the war, system, process and culture clashes ended up distancing the two countries.
 Two years after the end of the war, those who had been allies were now enemies, and the Cold War began.
 It would last for the next 40 years and would be fought for real, through proxy militias, on battlefields from Africa to Asia, in Afghanistan, Cuba, among many other places.
 Because by September 17, 1939, the Polish defense was already broken, their only hope was to retreat and reorganize in the Romanian bridgehead.
 These plans fell into disuse almost overnight, however, when more than 800,000 Red Army soldiers of the Soviet Union's 1st and 2nd Belorussian Fronts and 1st Ukrainian Front invaded eastern Poland, violating the Riga Peace Treaty, the Soviet-Polish Non-Aggression Pact, and other international, bilateral, and multilateral agreements.
 Using ships to transport goods is a much more efficient way to move large numbers of people and goods across the oceans.
 The function of the navy has always been to ensure that its country retains the ability to move its population and goods, while interfering with the enemy's ability to do the same.
 The North Atlantic campaign of World War II provides one of the clearest and most recent examples of this. The Americans were trying to move men and material across the Atlantic to support Britain.
 At the same time, the German navy, using mainly submarines, tried to stop this traffic.
 If the Allies had not succeeded, Germany could have taken power in Britain, as it did in the other European countries.
 Goats were first domesticated about 10,000 years ago in the Zagros Mountains of Iran.
 In order to obtain their milk, hair, meat and leather easily, ancient peoples and tribes began to keep them.
 Domestic goats were usually kept in herds that grazed on hillsides or other pasture lands, often tended by goat herders who were often children or adolescents, similar to the more popular shepherd. These methods of herding are still used today.
 In England, railways were already installed by the 16th century.
 Even though the rails of the carts were made of simple parallel wooden planks, they allowed the horses that pulled them to reach greater speeds and to haul heavier loads than on the somewhat more rugged roads of the day.
 The incorporation of sleepers to keep the rails in place occurred quite early, but gradually it was realized that the rails would be more efficient if they were coated with iron on their upper part.
 This became a common practice, although the iron caused greater wear on the wooden wheels of the wagons.
 Eventually, wooden wheels were replaced with iron ones and, in 1767, solid iron rails were used.
 The first form of transportation that was known was walking. The human being began to do it in an upright position two million years ago with the appearance of Homo Erectus (which means upright man).
 Their predecessors, the Australopithecus, did not have the habit of walking upright.
 Although bipedal traces have been found in Australopithecus fossils from 4.2 to 3.9 million years ago, it is possible that Sahelanthropus walked on two legs 7 million years ago.
 We can start living a more planet-friendly life, join environmental movements, or even become activists and fight to reduce, in some way, future suffering.
 It is, in many cases, like the treatment of the asymptomatic. But if we are not looking for a temporary situation, we should find the root of the problems and try to deactivate them.
 It is obvious that the world has undergone great changes, due to the technological and scientific advances of humanity, and the problems have intensified due to overpopulation and the extravagant lifestyle of people.
 After being approved by Congress on July 4, a handwritten and signed draft was sent to the printer John Dunlap, a few blocks away, by the President of the Congress, John Hancock, and the Secretary, Charles Thomson.
 Between 150 and 200 copies were made during the night, which are now known as the "Dunlap Copies".
 It was John Nixon who first read the document and did so in the Independence Hall courtyard on July 8.
 A copy was sent to George Washington on July 6, who ordered it read to his army in New York on July 9. A second copy arrived in London on August 10.
 The 25 photographs by Dunlap, which are known to still exist, are the oldest copies of the document that have survived; the original manuscript has been lost.
 A large number of paleontologists believe that a group of dinosaurs survived and is still alive today. They are the birds.
 Many people don't picture them as dinosaurs, since they have feathers and can fly.
 However, there are many features in birds that still resemble dinosaurs.
 They have scaly limbs and claws, lay eggs and move on their hind legs like the T-Rex.
 Nowadays, almost all computers work on the basis of manipulating data encoded under the binary system.
 A binary number can only have one of two values, they are 0 and 1 and, according to computer jargon, these numbers are known as binary digits, or bits.
 Internal poisoning may not be immediately evident. Symptoms, such as vomiting, are too common to be able to make an immediate diagnosis.
 The clearest indicator of internal poisoning may be finding an open bottle of toxic chemical cleaning products or medicines.
 Read the label for specific first aid information for that particular poison.
 Entomologists use the term parasitic insect in a formal sense to refer to this group of arthropods.
 The word comes from its old relationship with bedbugs, a species that has evolved to parasitize humans.
 The assassin and bed bugs are nest-building; they are adapted to inhabit the nest or home of their host.
 The number of cases of multiple sclerosis (MS) in the United States is estimated at nearly 400,000, making it the most common neurological disease among young and middle-aged adults.
 The central nervous system, the union of the brain, the spinal cord and the optic nerve, is the target of multiple sclerosis.
 Studies have shown that women are twice as likely as men to suffer from MS.
 A couple might conclude that raising a baby would not be the best thing for them or for the child.
 These couples could choose to plan to adopt a baby.
 In an adoption, the biological parents give up their parental rights so that a different couple can take care of the child.
 The ultimate goal of science is to decipher the way the world works through the scientific method, which serves as a guide for most scientific research.
 It is not, however, an experiment, it is a test that is used to rule out one or more of the possible hypotheses, asking questions and making observations that guide scientific research.
 The focus of both naturalists and philosophers was on classical works; especially, on the Latin version of the biblical text.
 The thoughts of Aristotle, especially the questions of science, even psychology, were accepted.
 As the dominance of the Greek language waned, the West distanced itself from its Greek philosophical and scientific roots.
 Often, many rhythms present in physiological processes and behavior depend decisively on internal cycles and their production through biological clocks.
 Periodic rhythms, which are not just reactions to regular external stimuli, have been recorded in almost all living things, including bacteria, fungi, plants, and animals.
 Biological clocks oscillate autonomously and have a free cyclical operating period, even if there are no external stimuli.
 One of the key indicators that DNA was a genetic material was the experiment conducted by Hershey and Chase.
 Hershey and Chase inserted their own DNA into a bacterium using phages, or viruses.
 They performed two experiments in which they labeled the phage DNA with radioactive phosphorus or the DNA protein with radioactive sulfur.
 Depending on the type of mutation, the significance of the affected piece of genetic material, and whether it involves germ cells, the mutation can have various effects.
 Only mutations in germ cells can be passed on to children, while those that occur elsewhere can cause cell death or cancer.
 Nature-based tourism often attracts people interested in visiting natural areas to enjoy the scenery, which includes wildlife and plant life.
 Some examples of possible activities in the place are: hunting, fishing, photography, birdwatching and visiting parks, and study of ecosystem information.
 An example is to visit, take photographs and learn about orangutans in Borneo.
 Every morning, people leave small towns in their cars to go to work, and they often cross paths with others whose jobs are in the same place they just left.
 In this dynamic transfer shuttle, everyone is somehow connected to and sustains a transportation system based on the use of private automobiles.
 Scientists now believe that this massive carbon economy has deprived the biosphere of one of its regular states that has contributed to the evolution of humanity for the last two million years.
 Everyone is part of society and uses the transportation systems; and almost everyone complains about them.
 In developed countries, it is rare to hear similar levels of complaints about water quality or bridge collapses.
 Why do transportation systems give rise to complaints of this magnitude and why do failures occur on a daily basis? Are transportation engineers simply incompetent or is there something more substantial going on?
 Traffic flow is the study of the individual movement of drivers and vehicles between two points and the interactions between them.
 Unfortunately, it is not easy to study traffic flow, as it is not possible to make accurate predictions about the behavior of drivers.
 Fortunately, there is a tendency for drivers to maintain relatively consistent behavior, which allows traffic flows to have a logical consistency and can be approximated mathematically.
 In order to graphically illustrate the flow of circulation, relationships were established between the three most important elements: (1) flow, (2) density and (3) velocity.
 These relationships facilitate both the planning and design as well as the operations of the roadway devices.
 The first species to take to the air were insects, which helped them to evade enemies more easily and find food and mates more effectively.
 Most insects have the advantage of being able to fold their wings back, attaching them to the sides of their bodies.
 This gives them a larger range of possible small places to hide from predators.
 Currently, anisoptera and ephemeroptera are the only insects unable to bend their wings.
 Millennia ago, a man named Aristarchus commented that the solar system revolved around the sun.
 There were those who shared his theory, but many others believed the opposite: that the solar system orbited the Earth, even the Sun and other stars.
 This seems to make sense, since on Earth we don't perceive its movement, right?
 The Amazon River is the largest and second longest river in the world. It contains 8 times more water than the next largest river.
 In addition, the Amazon is the widest river on the planet, in some places with a width of up to six miles.
 Of the total water flowing from the world's rivers into the oceans, 20 percent comes from the Amazon.
 The great Amazon River is 6,387 km (3,980 miles) long and receives water from thousands of smaller rivers.
 Although stone pyramids continued to be built until the end of the Old Kingdom, they could never surpass those of Giza, either in size or in the sublime technique of their construction.
 The ancient Egyptian town of the New Kingdom was amazed by the monuments of its ancestors, which at that time were more than a thousand years old.
 With a population of about 800, Vatican City is the smallest independent country in the world and the least populated.
 Italian is used in Vatican City, both for drafting its legislation and for issuing its official communications.
 The language spoken daily by most of those who work within the state is also Italian, and the use of Latin is generally reserved for religious ceremonies.
 All citizens living in Vatican City are Roman Catholic.
 The basic chemical elements such as gold, silver and copper have been known since ancient times, as they can all be found in nature in their original form and are relatively easy to extract with rudimentary tools.
 The philosopher Aristotle developed the theory that everything is made up of a combination of one or more of four elements: earth, water, air, and fire.
 This was more similar to the states of matter (with the same order): solid, liquid, gaseous and plasma, only that, at the same time, it had the theory that they transform into new substances that make up the things we see.
 Alloys are basically a combination of two or more metals. Remember that the periodic table has many elements.
 Metals are considered to be elements like calcium and potassium. There are also metals like gold and silver.
 It is also possible that alloys exist with small amounts of elements, such as carbon, that are not metallic.
 Everything in the Universe is made of matter, which is composed of tiny particles called atoms.
 The size of atoms is so impressively tiny that the end point of this sentence could contain billions of them.
 So when it was invented, the pencil won many friends.
 Unfortunately, as a result of the implementation of new writing methods, the pencil is used less and has lost its status.
 Nowadays, people write messages on the screens of their computers. They don't even need to approach a typewriter.
 One can only wonder what will become of the keyboard when something new comes along.
 The atomic bomb operates on the principle that energy is required to form a nucleus with a large number of protons and neutrons.
 It is similar to what happens when a heavy car is rolling up a hill. By splitting the core once more, it releases some of that energy.
 The nuclei of some atoms are unstable, meaning that they tend to break down with little or no push.
 The surface of the moon is made up of rocks and dust and its outer layer is called the crust.
 The crust is about 70 km thick on the near side and 100 km thick on the far side.
 It is thinner under the lunar seas and thicker under the highlands.
 It is possible that there are more seas on the near side because its crust is thinner, which made it easier for the lava to rise to the surface.
 Content theories focus on what it is that attracts or pleases people.
 These doctrines hold that people have certain needs or desires that have been internalized as they grew to maturity.
 These theories analyze what causes certain people to want the things they do and what factors in their environment force them to do or not do certain things.
 Two very well-known theories are Maslow's hierarchy of needs and Herzberg's two-factor theory.
 In general, there are two types of behavior when managers begin to lead their former colleagues. On one side of the spectrum is the attempt to continue being “one of the guys” (or girls).
 Managers in this category find it difficult to make decisions that employees dislike, to impose disciplinary measures, to conduct performance evaluations, to assign responsibilities, and to hold employees accountable.
 At the other end of the spectrum, you mutate into an unrecognizable person who believes it is necessary to change everything the group has been doing up to now and do it your way.
 After all, the ultimate responsibility for the success and failure of the team lies with the leader.
 This way of behaving often ends up distancing the leaders from the other team members.
 The same standards of excellence that conventional teams use apply to virtual teams, although there are some small differences.
 Often, virtual team members act as a point of contact for their closest physical group.
 They generally enjoy more autonomy than members of a traditional group, because their teams can meet according to different time zones, which, for example, might not be understood by the local management.
 The existence of an "invisible team" (Larson and LaFasto, 1989 p. 109) is also an exclusive element of virtual teams.
 The “invisible team” is the group in charge of management and to which each member reports. It is the one that sets the standards for each member.
 What motive could an organization have for subjecting itself to the demanding process of establishing a learning organization? One of the purposes of applying the theoretical concepts of organizational learning is to drive innovation.
 When all available resources are properly used in the operational departments of an organization, there is room for creativity and ingenuity.
 As a result, it is possible that the process of an organization working as a team to overcome a difficulty leads to a new innovative process to meet the needs of customers.
 For an organization to be innovative, leadership must first create a culture of innovation, as well as shared knowledge and organizational learning.
 Angel (2006) explains the continuous approach as a method used to help organizations achieve a higher level of performance.
 Neurobiological data provide factual evidence for a theoretical approach to the study of cognition, thus narrowing the field of research and increasing its accuracy.
 The existing correlation between brain pathology and behavior contributes to the research of scientists.
 It has long been known that various types of brain damage, trauma, injury and tumors affect behavior and cause changes in mental functions.
 Thanks to the rise of new technologies, we have the ability to see and investigate structures and processes that occur in the brain that have never been seen before.
 This provides us with abundant information and material to develop simulation models, which enhance our understanding of mental processes.
 While artificial intelligence is often associated with science fiction, it is a specialty of great relevance within computer science, which is responsible for the behavior, learning and intelligent adaptation of a machine.
 Research in the field of AI involves the development of machines to automate tasks that require intelligent behavior.
 Examples of this are, among others, monitoring, planning and scheduling, the ability to respond to customer diagnostics and queries, as well as facial recognition, handwriting, voice.
 These issues have become separate disciplines, focused on offering solutions to real-life problems.
 Artificial Intelligence is now often used in the fields of economics, medicine, engineering, and the military, as well as in various applications of video game software and personal computers.
 Field trips are an important part of any classroom. It is very common for a teacher to want to take her students to places that are not accessible by bus.
 The solution comes from technology, through virtual tours. Students can observe the objects exhibited in a museum, visit an aquarium or contemplate beautiful works of art sitting with their class.
 Sharing a virtual field trip is also a great way to reflect on an outing and share experiences with future classes.
 For example, every year, students at Bennet School in North Carolina design a web page about their trip to the state capital, and each year the page is updated, but the previous versions are kept online as a scrapbook.
 Blogs can also help students improve their writing. Although students often start their blogging experience with poor grammar and spelling, this usually changes in the presence of an audience.
 Because students are often the most critical readers, the blogger begins to strive to improve his writing to avoid criticism.
 Blogging, too, “requires students to be more aware of the world around them.” The need to engage an audience inspires them to be smart and interesting (Toto, 2004).
 Blogs are a resource that inspires collaboration and encourages students to deepen their learning beyond the typical school day.
 The proper use of blogs «can empower students to be more analytical and critical, through the active response to the contents of the Internet, they can define their positions in the context of the writings of others, in addition to establishing their perspectives on specific topics» (Oravec, 2002).
 Ottawa is the bilingual capital of Canada and has a variety of museums and art galleries that display the country's history and current events.
 Niagara Falls is further south and the north is home to the unspoiled natural beauty of Muskoka and the surrounding area.
 All of these aspects, among others, are what make Ontario seem intrinsically Canadian to foreigners.
 The large areas further north are sparsely populated and some are wilderness, almost uninhabited.
 To make a population comparison that will surprise many: more African Americans live in the United States than Canadians.
 The location of the islands of East Africa is off the east coast of that continent, in the Indian Ocean.
 Madagascar is by far the largest and a continent in itself when it comes to wildlife.
 Most of the smaller islands are independent states or associated with France and are popular for their beaches and luxury resorts.
 Islam was also brought to the lands by the Arabs and was imposed, to a large extent, in the Comoros and Mayotte.
 The initial point of European influence and colonialism took place in the 15th century, following the discovery by the Portuguese explorer, Vasco da Gama, of the route linking Europe to India.
 The region is bordered by the Sahel to the north, and the Atlantic Ocean to the south and west.
 Women: All female visitors are advised to say they are married, regardless of their actual marital status.
 It will also be useful to use a ring (just make sure it doesn't look too expensive).
 Women must be aware that cultural differences can cause what they consider harassment, and that it is not uncommon to be followed, taken by the arm, etc.
 Be firm in rejecting men and do not hesitate to defend your position (cultural differences or not, that is not right!).
 The founders of the modern city of Casablanca were the Berber fishermen during the 10th century BC and the Phoenicians, Romans and Moors used it as a strategic port, called Anfa.
 It was destroyed and rebuilt by the Portuguese under the name of Casa Branca, but in 1755 it was abandoned after an earthquake.
 The city was rebuilt by order of the Moroccan Sultan with the name of Daru l-Badya and the Spanish merchants who set up their businesses in that place called it Casablanca.
 Casablanca is one of the most boring places in all of Morocco to go shopping.
 In the outskirts of the old Medina, there are plenty of places where traditional Moroccan items are sold, such as earthenware pots, ceramics, leather goods, water pipes and a whole range of trinkets, although everything is geared towards tourists.
 Goma is a tourist point of the Democratic Republic of the Congo, on the eastern border, near Rwanda.
 In 2002, the lava from the Nyiragongo volcano destroyed Goma and left much of its streets submerged, especially in the city center.
 While Goma is quite safe, any visit to the outside should be considered in order to take note of the situation of the ongoing clashes in the province of North Kivu.
 The city is also the base for climbing Mount Nyiragongo and its mountain gorilla treks are some of the cheapest in Africa.
 To get around Goma, you can take a boda-boda (mototaxi). The regular (local) fare is CDF500 (Congolese francs) for a short trip.
 This, combined with its relative inaccessibility, has given Timbuktu an image of an exotic and remote land.
 Although today Timbuktu is a depleted city, it still has an airport and its reputation makes it a tourist attraction.
 In 1990, it was included in the list of endangered heritage sites, due to the threat of desert sands.
 It was one of the highlights of Henry Louis Gates's PBS special, Wonders of the African World.
 The city contrasts greatly with the rest of the country, as it has a more Arabic than African style.
 Kruger National Park (KNP) is located in the northeast of South Africa and extends along the border with Mozambique in the east, Zimbabwe in the north and the Crocodile River in the south.
 The park has an area of 19,500 km2 and is divided into 14 different ecozones, each of which has a different wildlife.
 This is one of the most important attractions in South Africa and is recognized as the main icon of the South African National Parks (SANParks).
 As in all South African nature reserves, there are daily conservation and access fees to the park.
 It may also be convenient to purchase a Wild Card that allows entry to selected parks in South Africa or to all National Parks in the country.
 The territory of Hong Kong takes its name from the homonymous island, which is the destination most of the tourists consider the main attraction.
 The skyline of Hong Kong has been compared to a light bar graph, with the presence of Victoria Harbour.
 The best way to enjoy the best views of Hong Kong is to leave the island and head to the Kowloon waterfront, located in front.
 It is in the reclaimed lands of the north coast of Hong Kong that its urban development is concentrated, densely.
 This is the site that the British conquerors adopted as their own, so if you want to see evidence of the colonial past of this region, it's a convenient place to start.
 The Sundarbans are the largest coastal mangrove forest in the world, stretching 80 km (50 miles) from the coast into Bangladesh and India.
 UNESCO has declared the Sundarbans a World Heritage Site. The section of the forest within Indian territory is called Sundarbans National Park.
 Notwithstanding, the forests are not only mangroves, but they also have some of the last trees that remain of the impressive jungles that once covered the Gangetic plain.
 The Sundarbans comprises an area of 3,850 km2 and nearly a third of its area is covered by water or marshy areas.
 The Sundarbans have been a sanctuary for wildlife since 1966 and it is estimated that there are now about 400 Bengal tigers and some 30,000 spotted deer in the area.
 Buses leave the inter-district station (across the river) throughout the day, though most, especially those going east and to Jakar (also called Bumthang), leave between 6:30 and 7:30 a.m.
 Because buses between districts are often full of passengers, it is recommended to buy a ticket a few days in advance.
 Almost all districts have the service of Japanese buses Coaster, which are comfortable and durable.
 Sharing a taxi is a quick and convenient way to get to nearby places, such as Paro (150 ngultrums) and Punakha (200 ngultrums).
 The Oyapock Bridge is a cable-stayed bridge that crosses it, connecting Oiapoque, a Brazilian city, and Saint-Georges de l'Oyapock, in French Guiana.
 The two towers reach a height of 83 m, with a length of 378 m and two lanes of 3.5 m wide.
 Under the bridge there is a 15-meter-wide space, and although its construction was completed in August 2011, it was not opened to traffic until March 2017.
 The bridge is expected to be fully operational in September 2017, when Brazilian customs controls are expected to be completed.
 The area that is now eastern Paraguay was inhabited by the Guaraní, the most important indigenous group in the region, who lived as hunter-gatherers and practiced subsistence agriculture.
 The Chaco region was home to other indigenous groups, for example, the Guaycurú and Payaguá, who hunted, gathered and fished as a means of subsistence.
 Paraguay, formerly known as the «Gigantic Province of the Indies», was born in the 16th century, as a result of the encounter between Spanish conquerors and native indigenous peoples.
 The Spanish started the colonization stage, which lasted for three centuries.
 Since Asunción was founded in 1537, Paraguay has been able to preserve much of its aboriginal idiosyncrasy and identity.
 Argentina is famous for having one of the best teams and the best players of polo in the world.
 The most important tournament of the year takes place in December at the polo fields of Las Cañitas.
 Other lower-level tournaments and matches may also be held at other times of the year.
 On the website of the Argentine Polo Association you can find information about the tournaments and where to buy tickets for the polo matches.
 The value of the Falkland Islands pound (FKP), the official currency of the Falkland Islands, is fixed at parity with the British pound (GBP).
 There is a bank on the islands. You can change your money there. It is opposite the FIC West shop in Stanley.
 Pounds sterling are usually accepted anywhere within the islands, and in Stanley, credit cards and US dollars are also accepted.
 There is a chance that credit cards will not be accepted on the outer islands, but you should be able to use British or US dollars. Ask the owners in advance to find out which payment methods they accept.
 It is virtually impossible to change money outside the Falkland Islands, so try to do so before you leave.
 Because Montevideo is located in the southern hemisphere, it is summer when it is winter in the northern hemisphere and vice versa.
 Montevideo is located in the subtropics, with frequent temperatures above +30° C during the summer.
 Winter cold can be deceptive: while it is very rare for temperatures to fall below freezing, wind and humidity can make it feel colder than the thermometer indicates.
 There are no specific "rainy" or "dry" seasons; the amount of rain remains almost the same throughout the year.
 While many of the animals in the park are used to seeing people, wildlife is still wild, so do not feed or disturb them.
 According to the park authorities, you should keep at least 100 yards/meters away from bears and wolves, and 25 yards/meters away from the rest of the wild animals.
 Despite how docile they may appear, bison, wapiti, elk, bears and virtually all large animals can be aggressive.
 Dozens of visitors suffer injuries each year from not keeping a proper distance. These animals are large, wild, and potentially dangerous; so respect their space.
 Also, remember that smells attract bears and other wild animals, so you should avoid having or cooking foods that give off a lot of aroma and keep the camp clean.
 The capital of Samoa, the city of Apia is located on the island of Upolu and has just under 40,000 inhabitants.
 Apia was founded in the 1850s and has been the capital of Samoa since 1959.
 In 1889, the port was the scene of a fateful naval clash when seven German, American and English ships refused to leave the port.
 They sank all the ships, except one British cruiser. Nearly two hundred Americans and Germans were killed.
 During the Mau independence war, a peaceful gathering in the city resulted in the assassination of the state leader, Tupua Tamasese Lealofi III.
 There are a large number of beaches, as Auckland has two harbours. The best known are in three areas.
 In the North Harbour district, on the Pacific Ocean, are the beaches of North Shore, which stretch from Long Bay in the north to Devonport in the south.
 The beaches are almost all sandy with safe swimming spots and mostly have pohutukawa trees that offer shade.
 In the Waitemataas harbour are the beaches of Tamaki Drive, in the extravagant Mission Bay and St Heliers suburbs in the central region of Auckland.
 These are family beaches, sometimes very crowded, with numerous and varied shops available on the thing. They are also safe for swimming.
 Number One is the most popular local beer and is not complex, but rather pleasant and refreshing. The other regional beer is Manta.
 While there is a wide variety of French wines, New Zealand and Australian wines could be considered better to transport.
 Tap water is completely safe to drink, but if you are concerned, you can easily find bottled water.
 Australians consider the notion of "flat white" to be foreign. A small black coffee is called an "espresso", cappuccino is served with cream (rather than froth) and tea is not served with milk.
 Hot chocolate is up to Belgian standards. Fruit juices are expensive, but delicious.
 Numerous trips to the reef are made throughout the year and, there, injuries from any of these causes are rare.
 However, accept the advice of the authorities, respect all signs and pay special attention to safety alerts.
 Cubomedusae are found near beaches and river estuaries from October to April, north of 1770. They can sometimes be found outside this period.
 Sharks do exist, but they almost never attack people. Most of them are afraid of people and would swim away.
 The ocean is not the place where saltwater crocodiles actively reside. Their primary habitat is the estuaries of the rivers that are located north of Rockhampton.
 Booking accommodation in advance gives you the peace of mind that you will have a place to stay when you arrive at your destination.
 Travel agents often have agreements with specific hotels, but through them it is also possible to book other types of accommodation, such as camping areas.
 Travel agents usually offer packages that include breakfast, transfers to and from the airport, and even combined flight and accommodation packages.
 They can also hold the reservation for you in case you need time to think about the offer, or to get other documents for your destination (such as a visa).
 However, any modification or request must be made through the travel agent first, and not directly through the hotel.
 At some festivals, most of those attending the music events choose to camp on site and most of the spectators consider it a crucial aspect of the experience.
 If you want to see the action up close, then you should arrive early to the camp to get a spot near the music events.
 It should be noted that, while the musical performances may have ended, in other areas of the festival could continue until late at night.
 Some festivals have special camping areas for families with young children.
 If you are crossing the Baltic in winter, check where the cabin is located, as going through the ice is very noisy for those affected.
 During the cruises to St. Petersburg, you also spend time in the city. Those who disembark are exempt from visa requirements (see terms).
 Casinos typically make great efforts to maximize the time and money their customers spend. There are usually no windows or clocks, and exits can be hard to find.
 They often offer special promotions of food, drink and entertainment in order to keep guests in good spirits and within the premises.
 Some establishments serve free spirits. Although drunkenness affects judgment and every good player knows the importance of staying sober.
 Anyone who intends to drive in high latitudes or mountain passes should allow for the possibility of snow, ice or low temperatures.
 On ice or snow, there is little friction, so it is not possible to drive as you would on bare asphalt.
 During snowstorms, a snowfall can occur that can trap you in a very short time.
 In addition, visibility can be reduced by snowfall or by condensation or ice that forms on the car windows.
 In many countries, on the other hand, ice and snow conditions are normal and traffic flows almost without interruption throughout the year.
 Safaris are probably the greatest tourist attraction in Africa and the most memorable part of the trip for many visitors.
 The popular use of the term safari refers to overland journeys to see the amazing wildlife of Africa, particularly in the savannah.
 Some animals, such as elephants and giraffes, are likely to approach vehicles and standard equipment will make good viewing possible.
 Sometimes, lions, cheetahs and leopards can be shy, so you will have more chance of seeing them using binoculars.
 The excursion known as a walking safari (also called a bushwalk, hiking safari, or trekking safari) is a form of hiking, either for a few hours or several days.
 The Paralympics will take place between August 24 and September 5, 2021, with a number of events taking place in other parts of Japan.
 Host of the 1964 Games, Tokyo will be the only Asian city to have hosted two Summer Olympics.
 If you booked your flights and accommodation for 2020 before the postponement was announced, you may face complications.
 There are different types of travel cancellation policies, but as of late March, the coverage of most of these policies based on the coronavirus does not extend until July 2020, which is when the Olympic Games are scheduled.
 Most event tickets are expected to cost between JPY 2500 and JPY 130 000, and general passes are expected to cost JPY 7000.
 Ironing clothes while they are still damp can help dry them. Many hotels have an iron and ironing board for travelers to use, even if they are not staying in the room.
 If you don't have an iron available, or don't want to use ironed sheets, you can try a hair dryer, if available.
 Be careful not to let the fabric get too hot, as it could shrink or, in extreme cases, burn.
 Several methods are known for purifying water, some more effectively targeting certain specific threats.
 In some places, it is enough to boil water for a minute, in others, several more are necessary.
 Not all filters are equally effective and, if this concerns you, you should consider buying bottled water with a seal from a certified company.
 Travellers may encounter pests of which they are not aware in regions where they are not known.
 Pests are capable of ruining food, causing irritation or, in more serious cases, causing allergic reactions, spreading poison or transmitting infections.
 Infectious diseases, by themselves, or dangerous animals, which can injure or kill individuals through the use of their strength, are not usually included in the category of pests.
 Duty-free shopping offers an opportunity to purchase, in certain places, products free of customs duties and excise taxes.
 Travellers visiting countries with high taxation can sometimes save a significant amount of money, particularly on goods such as spirits and tobacco.
 On the Buffalo-Pittsburgh Turnpike, the stretch between Point Marion and Fairmont is the most challenging driving conditions and often travels remote and lonely terrain.
 If you are not used to driving on rural roads, be alert: there are many steep hills, narrow lanes and sharp bends.
 The speed limits are notoriously lower than on the previous and following stretches, usually 35 to 40 mph (56-64 km/h), and their strict compliance is even more important than in any other section.
 Curiously, however, cell phone reception is much better here than in many other sections of the road like Pennsylvania Wilds.
 German pastries are of good quality and in Bavaria, the cakes are quite tasty and varied, similar to those made in Austria, its southern neighbor.
 Fruit cakes are common, with apples baked inside all year round and cherries and plums appearing in the summer.
 Many of the German baked goods also have almonds, hazelnuts and other nuts. In general, popular pastries make an excellent combination with a cup of strong coffee.
 If you fancy a small but tasty cake, try the Berliner, also called Pfannkuchen or Krapfen, depending on the region.
 Curry is a recipe based on herbs and spices and is served with meat or vegetables.
 We can find curry "dry" and "wet", depending on the volume of liquid.
 In the villages of the interior of northern India and Pakistan, yogurt is often used in curry. In southern India and other coastal areas of the subcontinent, coconut milk is common.
 With 17,000 islands to choose from, Indonesian cuisine is a generic term that encompasses a wide variety of regional cuisines that are spread throughout the country.
 However, used without any other qualification, the term tends to refer to the cuisine originating from the central and eastern regions of the main island of Java.
 The Javanese cuisine, now available throughout the archipelago, offers a variety of dishes seasoned with simple condiments, with predominance of the favorite aromas of the Javanese, such as peanuts, chili, sugar (especially Javanese coconut) and various aromatic spices.
 The stirrups are the supports for the feet of the riders that hang on both sides of the saddle.
 While they provide more stability for the rider, they can present safety issues, as it is possible for their feet to get stuck in them.
 If a rider is thrown from a horse but one foot is still caught in the stirrup, he can be dragged if the animal runs away. To reduce the risk, a series of safety precautions exist.
 First of all, most riders wear riding boots with a heel that has a flat and rather narrow sole.
 In addition, there are saddles, especially English ones, with safety bars that allow the leather of the stirrup to detach from its structure if a rider who is thrown out pulls back.
 The Cochamó Valley is Chile's most popular climbing destination and is known as the Yosemite of South America, with a variety of extensive granite walls and cliffs.
 The summits also offer stunning views from the peaks. Climbers from all corners of the globe constantly delineate new paths between their walls of infinite potential.
 Snow sports, such as skiing and snowboarding, are popular disciplines that involve sliding on skis or a snowboard over snowy terrain.
 Skiing is a major travel activity with many devotees, sometimes called "ski bums", who organize their vacations entirely around skiing at a specific location.
 The idea of skiing is very old, as there are cave paintings that represent skiers and that date back to around 5,000 BC.
 As a discipline, alpine skiing dates back to no later than the 17th century. In 1861, Norwegians inaugurated the first recreational ski club in Australia.
 Ski touring: also known as backcountry skiing, touring or ski mountaineering.
 Although they are linked, in general it does not involve practicing cross-country skiing or alpine-style mountaineering, developed on slopes of pronounced slope and with much more rigid skis and footwear.
 Imagine the ski slope as a hiking trail.
 In good conditions, you will be able to travel a little further than if you were walking, but you will rarely reach the speed of cross-country skiing on groomed slopes without a heavy pack.
 Europe is a relatively small continent, but with many independent countries. Under normal circumstances, traveling through several countries would mean having to handle visa applications and passport controls several times.
 However, the Schengen area functions as a single country in this regard.
 Generally, whenever you move within this region you will be able to cross borders without passing through a passport control again.
 Likewise, with a Schengen visa, it does not need to apply for permits for each of the member countries separately, which will save time, money and paperwork.
 There is no universal criterion to determine when a manufactured item can be considered an antique. Some tax agencies have established that items over 100 years old are antiques.
 The definition varies geographically, where the age limit might be more narrowly defined in places like North America than in Europe.
 It may happen that products made by hand are cataloged as antiques, even though they are newer than goods of similar characteristics manufactured in series.
 Reindeer herding is a vital means of livelihood among the Lapps and the culture related to this commercial activity is important to many who are engaged in other professions.
 Even so, even traditionally, not all the Lapps have been engaged in reindeer herding on a large scale, but have lived from fishing, hunting and other similar activities, using the reindeer mainly as draft animals.
 Today, many Lapps work in modern commercial activities. Tourism is an important source of income in Lapland, the Sámi region.
 Although it is used extensively, especially among non-Roma, the term Gypsy is often given a pejorative connotation, as it is associated with negative stereotypes and inaccurate perceptions of Roma.
 If your destination country is subject to a travel alert, this could affect your medical or cancellation insurance.
 You may want to consult the recommendations of other governments, but they are designed for their own citizens.
 For example, a North American visitor in the Middle East might face different situations than a European or an Arab.
 Travel warnings are just a concise summary of the political situation in another country.
 The views presented are often superficial, generic and too simplistic compared to the more detailed information available on other sites.
 The term severe weather generally refers to any dangerous weather event that is capable of causing damage, serious social disruption, or death.
 Severe weather can occur anywhere on the planet and there are different types depending on geography, topography and atmospheric conditions.
 Hurricanes, flash floods, excessive rainfall and wildfires are types and consequences of extreme weather, as are lightning, tornadoes, water spouts, and cyclones.
 Among the extreme regional and seasonal weather phenomena are dust storms, snowstorms, and hailstorms.
 Travellers are strongly advised to research any extreme weather risks in the area they are visiting, as this may affect their travel plans.
 Anyone planning a trip to a country that could be considered a war zone should receive professional training.
 It is likely that by searching "Hostile Area Course" on the Internet you will find the address of a local company.
 A course will usually cover all the topics that have been dealt with here in much more detail and, in general, with practical experience.
 A course typically lasts between 2 and 5 days, and includes role-playing games, first aid, and sometimes weapons training.
 Books and magazines about survival in the wild are common, but publications about war zones are scarce.
 Passengers who have scheduled sex-change surgery in another country should make sure they have valid documentation for the return trip.
 The position of governments regarding the possibility of issuing passports without gender (X) or updated documents in order to match the name of the person with the gender with which they feel identified is varied.
 The willingness of foreign governments to honor these documents varies greatly.
 Security checks at airports have become more invasive since September 11.
 Transgender people who have not yet had surgery should not have to wait to pass through scanners with their dignity and privacy intact.
 The return currents are the flow that recedes from the waves that break on the shore, often in a reef or similar.
 Because of the submarine topography, the return flow gathers in certain deeper areas and can originate a fast current with direction to deep waters.
 Most deaths occur due to fatigue from trying to swim against the current, which may be impossible.
 Once you get out of the current, swimming back will not be more complex than usual.
 Make an attempt to get somewhere where you can't get back to or, if you have the skills and someone has seen you, it might be best to wait for rescue.
 The impact of coming home happens before the cultural one (there is no period of happiness of «honeymoon»), it takes longer to go away and it can be harder.
 Travelers who have found it easy to adapt to a new culture sometimes have a hard time adapting to their native culture again.
 When he returns home after living abroad, he will have adapted to that new culture and will have lost some of the habits of his native culture.
 When you first traveled abroad, people were probably patient and understanding, because they knew that travelers need to adjust to a new country.
 People may not realize that tolerance and understanding are also needed for travelers returning to their homes.
 The light show and the pyramid sound are one of the most interesting things for children in the area.
 In the dark, you can see the pyramids and contemplate them in silence before the show begins.
 You will generally hear the sound of tourists and vendors at all times. The story of the sound and light show is like a story book.
 The sphinx appears as a backdrop and narrator of a long story.
 The scenes are projected onto the pyramids and all are illuminated.
 The discovery of the South Shetland Islands occurred in 1819 and several nations claim them. They have the largest number of bases, reaching sixteen active in 2020.
 The archipelago is 120 km north of the mainland. The largest island is King George, where the settlement of Villa Las Estrellas is located.
 Others include Livingston Island and Deception, where there is a spectacular natural harbor formed by the flooded caldera of an active volcano.
 Ellsworth Land, whose boundaries are defined by the Bellingshausen Sea, is a region located south of the peninsula.
 Here, the mountains of the Peninsula mix with the plateau and then rise again to form the 360 km long Ellsworth Mountains range, divided in two by the Minnesota Glacier.
 In the north, Sentinel Range, are the highest peaks of Antarctica, the Vinson Massif, with a peak at 4,892 meters on Mount Vinson.
 In remote areas where cell phone coverage is not available, a satellite phone may be your only option.
 A satellite phone cannot be compared to a mobile phone, because to make a call, you must be outdoors and have a clear line of sight to the satellite.
 The service is often used in water transportation, including recreational boats, as well as for expeditions that require remote data and voice.
 You can check with your local telephone service provider for more information on how to sign up for this service.
 Combining travel and learning has become a very popular option for those who plan to take a sabbatical year.
 This is very popular among high school graduates, as it allows them to take a year off before college without jeopardizing their education.
 In many cases, enrolling in a study program abroad for a gap year can, in effect, increase the chances of accessing higher education once you return to your home country.
 Normally, a tuition fee will be charged to enroll in these educational programs.
 Finland is an excellent destination for sailing: the "land of a thousand lakes" also has thousands of islands, both in the lakes and in the coastal archipelagos.
 A yacht is not always necessary on the archipelagos and lakes.
 While the coastal archipelagos and the larger lakes are large enough for any yacht, smaller boats or even a kayak offer a different experience.
 Boating is a national recreational activity in Finland, with a boat for every seven or eight inhabitants.
 The same is true in Norway, Sweden and New Zealand, but, other than that, it is quite unique (e.g., in the Netherlands the ratio is one in forty).
 Most of the exclusive cruises that are made through the Baltic Sea include a long stay in St. Petersburg, Russia.
 This means that you have the possibility of making a visit to the historic city for a few whole days during your return trip, sleeping on the boat overnight.
 If you only disembark during excursions on board, you do not need a separate visa (since 2009).
 In the brochures of some cruises, Berlin, Germany is mentioned. However, as you can see in the map above, this city is not near the sea and its visit is not included in the price of the cruise.
 Flying can be scary for people of any age and place, particularly if they have never been through the experience or if they have lived through a traumatic event.
 There is no shame in this: it is no different from other types of personal fears and dislikes that afflict so many others.
 For some, understanding a little about how planes operate and what happens during a flight can help to put to rest a fear that stems from a lack of knowledge or a sense of not having control.
 Delivery companies are paid very well to make fast deliveries. Often, time is very important when it comes to business documents, merchandise, or urgent repairs.
 Large companies have their own planes on some routes, but there was a problem for smaller companies and other routes.
 If they made an air freight shipment, in some routes they may have been delayed for days in the unloading and customs.
 The only option to do it more quickly was to send it as checked baggage. Airline regulations prohibit transporting baggage without a passenger, and this is where you come in.
 The obvious way to travel first class or business class on an airplane is to spend a fortune for that privilege (or, better yet, have your company pay for you).
 But there is a price: in general, you can pay up to four times more for the economy fare in business class and up to eleven times more in first class.
 It is usually a waste of time to look for discounts for first class or business class seats on direct flights.
 Airlines are well aware that there is a core group of travellers who are willing to pay a lot of money for the privilege of getting to a place quickly and comfortably, and they charge accordingly.
 The capital of Moldova is Chişinău. Its regional language is Romanian, although Russian is also widely spoken.
 Moldova is a republic composed of many ethnic groups, among which conflicts of this nature have arisen.
 In 1994, this conflict led to the formation of the self-proclaimed Republic of Transnistria, east of Moldova, which has its own government and currency, but is not recognized by any UN member state.
 Despite the failure of political negotiations, economic ties between the two parts of Moldova have been re-established.
 Orthodox Christianity is the majority religion in Moldova.
 Izmir is the third most important city in Turkey, with approximately 3.7 million inhabitants, the second largest port after Istanbul and a very good transport hub.
 What was once the ancient city of Smyrna is now a modern, evolved and busy metropolis, established around a vast bay and surrounded by mountains.
 Both the wide boulevards and the cutting-edge shopping malls are dotted with traditional red-tiled roofs, 18th-century market stalls, and old mosques and churches, but the atmosphere is more Mediterranean than traditional Turkish.
 The village of Haldarsvík has excursions to the nearby island of Eysturoy and has an atypical octagonal church.
 In the cemetery, there are interesting sculptures of marble in the shape of a dove on some tombs.
 It is worth spending half an hour to take a walk around the fascinating town.
 To the north and within easy reach is the romantic and breathtaking city of Sintra, which gained popularity among foreigners due to a vivid account of its splendors by Lord Byron.
 In Scotturb, bus 403 goes regularly to Sintra and stops at Cabo da Roca.
 Also visit, to the north, the great Sanctuary of Our Lady of Fatima (Santuário) which is a place where there were apparitions of the Virgin Mary, famous all over the world.
 Remember that you are basically visiting a place that served as a mass grave and is also a site of almost invaluable significance to a large part of the world's population.
 There are still many men and women alive who survived their stay here and many more who had loved ones who were murdered or worked here to their death, both Jewish and non-Jewish.
 Give the place all the dignity, solemnity and respect it deserves. Don't joke about the Holocaust or Nazism.
 Do not ruin the place by making marks or graffiti on the structures.
 Catalan and Spanish are the official languages of Barcelona. About half of the people prefer to speak Catalan, most understand it and almost everyone speaks Spanish.
 However, because Catalan is legally the first official language, most signs are written only in that language.
 Still, Spanish is also widely used in public transportation and other buildings.
 Although the usual announcements in the Metro are only in Catalan, unscheduled interruptions are made in a wide variety of languages through an automatic program in a wide variety of languages, including Spanish, English, French, Arabic and Japanese.
 Parisians have a reputation for being self-centered, rude, and arrogant.
 Although it is often only an inaccurate stereotype, the best way to enjoy Paris is to behave as well as possible, like a well-bred person. This will make moving around much easier.
 A few courteous gestures on your part will quickly dispel the apparent brusque manners of Parisians.
 Plitvice Lakes National Park is very wooded, with mainly beech, fir and spruce trees, and has a mixed alpine and Mediterranean vegetation.
 It has a wide and extraordinary range of vegetation communities, thanks to the variety of microclimates, soils and altitude levels.
 This region is also home to a wide variety of animal and bird species.
 The European brown bear, the wolf, the eagle, the owl, the lynx, the wild cat and the capercaillie are some of the exotic animals, among many ordinary creatures, that can be found in the place.
 When visiting monasteries, women must wear skirts that cover their knees and cannot wear bare shoulders.
 While almost all monasteries give robes to women who arrive unprepared, if you bring your own, especially if it is brightly colored, the monk or nun will smile at you at the entrance.
 Following the same line of reasoning, men are required to wear pants that cover their knees.
 This can also be borrowed from the clothes available when entering, but that clothing is not washed after each person who wears it, so it may not feel comfortable wearing these skirts. One size fits all for all men!
 The cuisine of Majorca, like that of other similar regions of the Mediterranean, is based on bread, vegetables and meat (especially pork), and uses olive oil in all its recipes.
 Pa amb Oli is a popular and simple meal, typical of summer, and is a bread with olive oil, tomato and any other ingredient such as cheese or tuna, among others.
 All nouns, as well as the word Sie to mean 'you', always begin with a capital letter, even if they are in the middle of a sentence.
 It is a key method for differentiating between certain verbs and objects.
 It can also be said that it simplifies reading, although its writing is somewhat complex, since it is necessary to find out if a verb or adjective is used in a substantivated form.
 Speaking Italian is relatively easy, as most of the words sound the same as they are written.
 The c and the g are the letters that you should be most careful with, as they are pronounced differently depending on the vowel that follows them.
 Also, be sure to respect the difference in pronunciation of the r and the rr. For example, caro means expensive, while carro means car.
 Persian has a relatively simple and mostly regular grammar.
 Therefore, reading this grammar book will help you to learn a lot about Persian grammar rules and to achieve a better understanding of the sentences.
 It goes without saying that if you speak any Romance language, learning Portuguese will be easier.
 However, those who speak some Spanish may come to the hasty conclusion that Portuguese is quite similar and that it is unnecessary to study it individually.
 Nowadays, pre-modern observatories have generally become obsolete and remain in operation as museums or educational destinations.
 Since, in its heyday, light pollution was not a problem of great magnitude as it is today, it is common to find them in cities or on campuses, being of easier access than those that are built in modern times.
 Most current research telescopes consist of huge structures installed in remote areas with favorable atmospheric conditions.
 The contemplation of cherry blossoms, called hanami, is a traditional Japanese custom dating back to the 8th century.
 The concept came from China, where the plum flower was the most appreciated.
 It was the Emperor of Japan who organized the first celebrations of the cherry blossoms, only for him and other members of the Imperial Court aristocracy.
 Plants look best when they are in a natural environment, so resist the temptation to take just one specimen.
 If you collect "specimens" during a visit to a formally organized garden, you will be asked to leave, without discussion.
 Generally, Singapore is a very safe place to be and very easy to get around; plus, you can buy almost any product from your arrival.
 But because of its location in the "high tropics," a few degrees north of the equator, you will always have to deal with heat and, when the sky is clear, strong sun, which happens less often.
 In addition, some buses go to Hebron, to the north, which is the place where, according to the Bible, the patriarchs Abraham, Isaac, Jacob and their wives were buried.
 He must make sure that the bus he is getting on is going to Hebron and not just to Kiryat Arba, a Jewish neighborhood near that place.
 Inland waterways can be a good topic for holidays.
 For example, visiting castles in the Loire Valley, the Rhine Valley, taking a cruise to interesting destinations on the Danube, or cruising the Erie Canal.
 They also delineate routes for popular hiking and cycling trails.
 For the Christian religion, Christmas is one of its most important festivities, in which the birth of Jesus Christ is celebrated.
 There are many traditions related to this holiday that have been incorporated by non-believers in both Christian and non-Christian countries around the globe.
 It is a tradition to spend Easter night on a boat to watch the sunrise.
 There are, of course, Christian theological explanations for this tradition, but it may well be a pre-Christian ritual of spring and fertility.
 Traditional churches often offer a Paschal Vigil on Saturday night during the Easter weekend, and congregations usually begin celebrating the resurrection of Christ as soon as midnight arrives.
 All animals that originally arrived on the islands came to this place by swimming, flying or floating.
 Because they are so far from the mainland, mammals could not reach the islands, which made the giant tortoise the main grazing animal on the Galápagos.
 Many mammalian species have been introduced to Galápagos since man arrived on the archipelago, such as goats, horses, cattle, rabbits, dogs, and cats.
 If you travel to the Arctic or Antarctic in winter, you will experience polar night, which means that the sun does not rise above the horizon.
 Since the sky will be dark for most of the day, it is a great opportunity to see the Northern Lights.
 Thanks to the sparse population that resides in these regions and that, as a result, there are usually no light pollution problems, you can also enjoy the stars.
 In Japan, the work culture is more vertical and formal than what Westerners are used to.
 The typical business attire is suits and coats and co-workers are addressed by their last names or job titles.
 Harmony in the workplace is key, where group efforts are emphasized over focusing on individual accomplishments.
 Workers often need approval from their superiors to make decisions and are expected to follow instructions without question.
Results bleu: {'bleu': 0.318207098511383, 'precisions': [0.6350887889642558, 0.38319460959175583, 0.2517136014534644, 0.16737050762733777], 'brevity_penalty': 1.0, 'length_ratio': 1.061526637271955, 'translation_length': 26242, 'reference_length': 24721} results chrF: {'score': 60.87575430188091, 'char_order': 6, 'word_order': 0, 'beta': 2}